Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 35. new text end new text begin Electronic benefits transfer; contracting and procurement. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding chapter 16C, the commissioner is exempt from the contract term limits for the issuance of public benefits through an electronic benefit transfer system and related services. These contracts may have up to an initial five-year term, with extensions not to exceed a ten-year total contract duration. new text end ARTICLE 2 CHILD PROTECTION AND WELFARE POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.01, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Individual who is related. "Individual who is related" means a spouse, a parent, a birth or adopted child or stepchild, a stepparent, a stepbrother, a stepsister, a niece, a nephew, an adoptive parent, a grandparent, a sibling, an aunt, an uncle, or a legal guardian.new text begin For purposes of family child foster care, individual who is related also includes an individual who, prior to the child's placement in the individual's home for foster care or adoption, was an important friend of the child or of the child's parent or custodian, including an individual with whom the child has resided or had significant contact or who has a significant relationship to the child or the child's parent or custodian.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.05, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Foster care by an individual who is related to a child; license required. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1), in order to provide foster care for a child, an individual who is related to the child, other than a parent, or legal guardian, must be licensed by the commissioner except as provided by section 142B.06. new text begin (b) An individual who is related to the child may seek foster care licensure through the county agency or a private agency in the community designated or licensed by the commissioner. The county agency must provide information to all potential relative foster care providers about this choice. Counties are not obligated to pay costs for services provided by private agencies. new text end new text begin (c) If an individual who is related to a child is seeking licensure to provide foster care for the child and the individual has a domestic partner but is not married to the domestic partner, only the individual related to the child must be licensed to provide foster care. The commissioner must conduct background studies on household members according to section 245C.03, subdivision 1. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.47, is amended to read: 142B.47 TRAINING ON RISK OF SUDDEN UNEXPECTED INFANT DEATH AND ABUSIVE HEAD TRAUMA FOR CHILD FOSTER CARE PROVIDERS. (a) Licensed child foster care providersnew text begin , except individuals related to the child,new text end that care for infants or children through five years of age must document that before caregivers assist in the care of infants or children through five years of age, deleted text begin theydeleted text end new text begin the caregiversnew text end are instructed on the standards in section 142B.46 and receive training on reducing the risk of sudden unexpected infant death and abusive head trauma from shaking infants and young children.new text begin Licensed child foster care providers who are related to the child and who only serve a relative child must document completion of the training required under this section within 30 days after licensure.new text end This section does not apply to emergency relative placement under section 142B.06. The training on reducing the risk of sudden unexpected infant death and abusive head trauma may be provided as: (1) orientation training to child foster care providers who care for infants or children through five years of age under Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070, subpart 1; or (2) in-service training to child foster care providers who care for infants or children through five years of age under Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070, subpart 2. (b) Training required under this section must be at least one hour in length and must be completed at least once every five years. At a minimum, the training must address the risk factors related to sudden unexpected infant death and abusive head trauma, means of reducing the risk of sudden unexpected infant death and abusive head trauma, and license holder communication with parents regarding reducing the risk of sudden unexpected infant death and abusive head trauma. (c) Training for child foster care providers must be approved by the county or private licensing agency that is responsible for monitoring the child foster care provider under section 142B.30. The approved training fulfills, in part, training required under Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.51, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Child passenger restraint systems; training requirement. (a) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services under chapter 245A or the Department of Children, Youth, and Families under this chapter and Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, that serve a child or children under eight years of age must document training that fulfills the requirements in this subdivision. (b) Before a license holder, staff person, or caregiver transports a child or children under age eight in a motor vehicle, the person transporting the child must satisfactorily complete training on the proper use and installation of child restraint systems in motor vehicles. Training completed under this section may be used to meet initial or ongoing training under Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070, subparts 1 and 2. (c) Training required under this section must be completed at orientation or initial training and repeated at least once every five years. At a minimum, the training must address the proper use of child restraint systems based on the child's size, weight, and age, and the proper installation of a car seat or booster seat in the motor vehicle used by the license holder to transport the child or children. (d) Training under paragraph (c) must be provided by individuals who are certified and approved by the Office of Traffic Safety within the Department of Public Safety. License holders may obtain a list of certified and approved trainers through the Department of Public Safety website or by contacting the agency. (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), for an emergency relative placement under section 142B.06, the commissioner may grant a variance to the training required by this subdivision for a relative who completes a child seat safety check up. The child seat safety check up trainer must be approved by the Department of Public Safety, Office of Traffic Safety, and must provide one-on-one instruction on placing a child of a specific age in the exact child passenger restraint in the motor vehicle in which the child will be transported. Once granted a variance, and if all other licensing requirements are met, the relative applicant may receive a license and may transport a relative foster child younger than eight years of age. A child seat safety check up must be completed each time a child requires a different size car seat according to car seat and vehicle manufacturer guidelines. A relative license holder must complete training that meets the other requirements of this subdivision prior to placement of another foster child younger than eight years of age in the home or prior to the renewal of the child foster care license. new text begin (f) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a child foster care license holder who is an individual related to the child and who only serves a relative child must document completion of the training required under this section within 30 days after licensure. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.80, is amended to read: 142B.80 CHILD FOSTER CARE TRAINING REQUIREMENT; MENTAL HEALTH TRAINING; FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDERS TRAINING. Prior to a nonemergency placement of a child in a foster care home, the child foster care license holder and caregivers in foster family and treatment foster care settings must complete two hours of training that addresses the causes, symptoms, and key warning signs of mental health disorders; cultural considerations; and effective approaches for dealing with a child's behaviors. At least one hour of the annual training requirement for the foster family license holder and caregivers must be on children's mental health issues and treatment. Except for providers and services under chapter 245Dnew text begin and child foster care license holders who are individuals related to the child and who only serve a relative child who does not have fetal alcohol spectrum disordernew text end , the annual training must also include at least one hour of training on fetal alcohol spectrum disorders, which must be counted toward the 12 hours of required in-service training per year. Short-term substitute caregivers are exempt from these requirements. Training curriculum shall be approved by the commissioner of children, youth, and families. Sec. 6. new text begin [142B.81] CHILD FOSTER CARE TRAINING; RELATIVE CAREGIVERS. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the required hours under Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070, subpart 2, a child foster care license holder who is an individual related to the child must complete a minimum of six hours of in-service training per year in one or more of the areas in Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070, subpart 2, or in other areas as agreed upon by the licensing agency and the foster parent. The relative child foster care license holder must consult with the licensing agency and complete training in areas that are most applicable to caring for the relative children in foster care in the home. This section does not apply to a child foster care license holder who is licensed to care for both a relative child and a nonrelative child. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 16b. new text end new text begin Relative. new text end new text begin "Relative" has the meaning given in section 260C.007, subdivision 27. For purposes of background studies affiliated with child foster care licensure, a person is a relative if the person was known to the child or the child's parent before the child is placed in foster care. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.65, is amended to read: 260.65 NONCUSTODIAL PARENTS; RELATIVE PLACEMENT. (a) Prior to the removal of an African American or a disproportionately represented child from the child's home, the responsible social services agency must make active efforts to identify and locate the child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent and the child's relatives to notify the child's parent and relatives that the child is or will be placed in foster caredeleted text begin ,deleted text end and provide the child's parent and relatives with a list of legal resources. The notice to the child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent and relatives must also include the information required under section 260C.221, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). The responsible social services agency must maintain detailed records of the agency's efforts to notify parents and relatives under this section. (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 260C.219, the responsible social services agency must assess an African American or a disproportionately represented child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent's ability to care for the child before placing the child in foster care. If a child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent is willing and able to provide daily care for the African American or disproportionately represented child temporarily or permanently, the court shall order deleted text begin thatdeleted text end the child deleted text begin be placed indeleted text end new text begin intonew text end the home of the noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent pursuant to section 260C.178 or 260C.201, subdivision 1. The responsible social services agency must make active efforts to assist a noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent with remedying any issues that may prevent the child from being deleted text begin placed with thedeleted text end new text begin ordered into the home of anew text end noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent. (c) The relative search, notice, engagement, and placement consideration requirements under section 260C.221 apply under this act. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.66, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Emergency removal or placement permitted. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the emergency removal of an African American or a disproportionately represented deleted text begin child's parent or custodiandeleted text end new text begin childnew text end or the emergency placement of the child in a foster setting in order to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.691, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. new text begin Establishment and new text end duties. new text begin (a) The African American Child and Family Well-Being Advisory Council is established for the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin (b) The council shall consist of 31 members appointed by the commissioner and must include representatives with lived personal or professional experience within African American communities. Members may include but are not limited to youth who have exited the child welfare system; parents; legal custodians; relative and kinship caregivers or foster care providers; community service providers, advocates, and members; county and private social services agency case managers; representatives from faith-based institutions; academic professionals; a representative from the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage; the Ombudsperson for African American Families; and other individuals with experience and knowledge of African American communities. Council members must be selected through an open appointments process under section 15.0597. The terms, compensation, and removal of council members are governed by section 15.059. new text end new text begin (c) new text end The deleted text begin African American Child Well-Being Advisorydeleted text end council must: (1) review annual reports related to African American children involved in the child welfare system. These reports may include but are not limited to the maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency of African American children; (2) assist with and make recommendations to the commissioner for developing strategies to reduce maltreatment determinations, prevent unnecessary out-of-home placement, promote culturally appropriate foster care and shelter or facility placement decisions and settings for African American children in need of out-of-home placement, ensure timely achievement of permanency, and improve child welfare outcomes for African American children and their families; (3) review summary reports on targeted case reviews prepared by the commissioner to ensure that responsible social services agencies meet the needs of African American children and their families. Based on data collected from those reviews, the council shall assist the commissioner with developing strategies needed to improve any identified child welfare outcomes, including but not limited to maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency for African American children; (4) deleted text begin assist the Cultural and Ethnic Communities Leadership Council with makingdeleted text end new text begin makenew text end recommendations to the commissioner and the legislature for public policy and statutory changes that specifically consider the needs of African American children and their families involved in the child welfare system; (5) advise the commissioner on stakeholder engagement strategies and actions that the commissioner and responsible social services agencies may take to improve child welfare outcomes for African American children and their families; (6) assist the commissioner with developing strategies for public messaging and communication related to racial disproportionality and disparities in child welfare outcomes for African American children and their families; (7) assist the commissioner with identifying and developing internal and external partnerships to support adequate access to services and resources for African American children and their families, including but not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, food and nutrition support, health care, child care assistance, and educational support and training; and (8) assist the commissioner with developing strategies to promote the development of a culturally diverse and representative child welfare workforce in Minnesota that includes professionals who are reflective of the community served and who have been directly impacted by lived experiences within the child welfare system. The council must also assist the commissioner with exploring strategies and partnerships to address education and training needs, hiring, recruitment, retention, and professional advancement practices. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.692, is amended to read: 260.692 AFRICAN AMERICAN CHILD new text begin AND FAMILY new text end WELL-BEING UNIT. Subdivision 1. Duties. The African American Child new text begin and Family new text end Well-Being Unit, currently established by the commissioner, must: (1) assist with the development of African American cultural competency training and review child welfare curriculum in the Minnesota Child Welfare Training Academy to ensure that responsible social services agency staff and other child welfare professionals are appropriately prepared to engage with African American children and their families and to support family preservation and reunification; (2) provide technical assistance, including on-site technical assistance, and case consultation to responsible social services agencies to assist agencies with implementing and complying with the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act; (3) monitor individual county and statewide disaggregated and nondisaggregated data to identify trends and patterns in child welfare outcomes, including but not limited to reporting, maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency of African American children and develop strategies to address disproportionality and disparities in the child welfare system; (4) develop and implement a system for conducting case reviews when the commissioner receives reports of noncompliance with the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act or when requested by the parent or custodian of an African American child. Case reviews may include but are not limited to a review of placement prevention efforts, safety planning, case planning and service provision by the responsible social services agency, relative placement consideration, and permanency planning; (5) establish and administer a request for proposals process for African American and disproportionately represented family preservation grants under section 260.693, monitor grant activities, and provide technical assistance to grantees; (6) in coordination with the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, coordinate services and create internal and external partnerships to support adequate access to services and resources for African American children and their families, including but not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, food and nutrition support, health care, child care assistance, and educational support and training; and (7) develop public messaging and communication to inform the public about racial disparities in child welfare outcomes, current efforts and strategies to reduce racial disparities, and resources available to African American children and their families involved in the child welfare system. Subd. 2. Case reviews. (a) The African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Unit must conduct systemic case reviews to monitor targeted child welfare outcomes, including but not limited to maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency of African American children. (b) The reviews under this subdivision must be conducted using a random sampling of representative child welfare cases stratified for certain case related factors, including but not limited to case type, maltreatment type, if the case involves out-of-home placement, and other demographic variables. In conducting the reviews, unit staff may use court records and documents, information from the social services information system, and other available case file information to complete the case reviews. (c) The frequency of the reviews and the number of cases, child welfare outcomes, and selected counties reviewed shall be determined by the unit in consultation with the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, with consideration given to the availability of unit resources needed to conduct the reviews. (d) The unit must monitor all case reviews and use the collective case review information and data to generate summary case review reports, ensure compliance with the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act, and identify trends or patterns in child welfare outcomes for African American children. (e) The unit must review information from members of the public received through the compliance and feedback portal, including policy and practice concerns related to individual child welfare cases. After assessing a case concern, the unit may determine if further necessary action should be taken, which may include coordinating case remediation with other relevant child welfare agencies in accordance with data privacy laws, including the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, and offering case consultation and technical assistance to the responsible local social services agency as needed or requested by the agency. Subd. 3. Reports. (a) The African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Unit must provide regular updates on unit activities, including summary reports of case reviews, to the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, and must publish an annual census of African American children in out-of-home placements statewide. The annual census must include data on the types of placements, age and sex of the children, how long the children have been in out-of-home placements, and other relevant demographic information. (b) The African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Unit shall gather summary data about the practice and policy inquiries and individual case concerns received through the compliance and feedback portal under subdivision 2, paragraph (e). The unit shall provide regular reports of the nonidentifying compliance and feedback portal summary data to the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council to identify child welfare trends and patterns to assist with developing policy and practice recommendations to support eliminating disparity and disproportionality for African American children. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.001, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Juvenile protection proceedings. (a) The paramount consideration in all juvenile protection proceedings is the health, safety, and best interests of the child. In proceedings involving an American Indian child, as defined in section 260.755, subdivision 8, the best interests of the child must be determined consistent with sections 260.751 to 260.835 and the Indian Child Welfare Act, United States Code, title 25, sections 1901 to 1923. (b) The purpose of the laws relating to juvenile protection proceedings is: (1) to secure for each child under the jurisdiction of the court, the care and guidance, preferably in the child's own home, as will best serve the spiritual, emotional, mental, and physical welfare of the child; (2) to provide judicial procedures that protect the welfare of the child; (3) to preserve and strengthen the child's family ties whenever possible and in the child's best interests, removing the child from the custody of parents only when the child's welfare or safety cannot be adequately safeguarded without removal; (4) to ensure that when removal from the child's own family is necessary and in the child's best interests, the responsible social services agency has legal responsibility for the child removal either: (i) pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement between the child's parent or guardian or the child, when the child is over age 18, and the responsible social services agency; or (ii) by court order pursuant to section 260C.151, subdivision 6; 260C.178; 260C.201; 260C.325; or 260C.515; (5) to ensure that, when placement is pursuant to court order, the court order removing the child or continuing the child in foster care contains an individualized determination that placement is in the best interests of the child that coincides with the actual removal of the child; (6) to ensure that when the child is removed, the child's care and discipline is, as nearly as possible, equivalent to that which should have been given by the parents and is either in: (i) the home of a noncustodial parent pursuant to section 260C.178 or 260C.201, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1); (ii) the home of a relative pursuant to emergency placement by the responsible social services agency under chapter 245A; or (iii) foster care licensed under chapter 245A; and (7) to ensure appropriate permanency planning for children in foster care including: (i) unless reunification is not required under section 260.012, developing a permanency plan for the child that includes a primary plan for reunification with the child's parent or guardian and a secondary plan for an alternative, legally permanent home for the child in the event reunification cannot be achieved in a timely manner; (ii) identifying, locating, and assessing both parents of the child as soon as possible and offering reunification services to both parents of the child as required under sections 260.012 and 260C.219; new text begin (iii) inquiring about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761, and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10; new text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end identifying, locating, and notifying relatives of both parents of the child according to section 260C.221; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end making a placement with a family that will commit to being the legally permanent home for the child in the event reunification cannot occur at the earliest possible time while at the same time actively supporting the reunification plan; and deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (vi)new text end returning the child home with supports and services, as soon as return is safe for the child, or when safe return cannot be timely achieved, moving to finalize another legally permanent home for the child. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.007, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Habitual truant. "Habitual truant" means a child deleted text begin under the age of 17deleted text end new text begin who is at least 12 years old and less than 18new text end years new text begin old new text end who is absent from attendance at school without lawful excuse deleted text begin for seven school days per school year if the child is in elementary school ordeleted text end for one or more class periods on seven school days per school year if the child is in middle school, junior high school, or high school or a child who is 17 years of age who is absent from attendance at school without lawful excuse for one or more class periods on seven school days per school year and who has not lawfully withdrawn from school under section 120A.22, subdivision 8.new text begin Pursuant to section 260C.163, subdivision 11, habitual truant also means a child under age 12 who has been absent from school for seven school days without lawful excuse, based on a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the child's absence is not due to the failure of the child's parent, guardian, or custodian to comply with compulsory instruction laws.new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.141, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Who may file; required form. (a) Any reputable person, including but not limited to any agent of the commissioner of children, youth, and families, having knowledge of a child in this state or of a child who is a resident of this state, who appears to be in need of protection or services or neglected and in foster care, may petition the juvenile court in the manner provided in this section. (b) A petition for a child in need of protection filed by an individual who is not a county attorney or an agent of the commissioner of children, youth, and families shall be filed on a form developed by the state court administrator and provided to court administrators. Copies of the form may be obtained from the court administrator in each county. The court administrator shall review the petition before it is filed to determine that it is completed. The court administrator may reject the petition if it does not indicate that the petitioner has contacted the responsible social services agency. An individual may file a petition under this subdivision without seeking internal review of the responsible social services agency's decision. The court shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that a need for protection or services exists before the matter is set for hearing. If the matter is set for hearing, the court administrator shall notify the responsible social services agency by sending notice to the county attorney. The petition must contain: (1) a statement of facts that would establish, if proven, that there is a need for protection or services for the child named in the petition; (2) a statement that petitioner has reported the circumstances underlying the petition to the responsible social services agency, and protection or services were not provided to the child; (3) a statement whether there are existing juvenile or family court custody orders or pending proceedings in juvenile or family court concerning the child; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) a statement of the relationship of the petitioner to the child and any other partiesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) a statement whether the petitioner has inquired of the parent or parents of the child, the child, and relatives about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10. new text end The court may not allow a petition to proceed under this paragraph if it appears that the sole purpose of the petition is to modify custody between the parents. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.150, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Identifying parents of child; diligent efforts; data. (a) The responsible social services agency shall make diligent effortsnew text begin to inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, andnew text end to identify and locate both parents of any child who is the subject of proceedings under this chapter. Diligent efforts include: (1) asking the custodial or known parent to identify any nonresident parent of the child and provide information that can be used to verify the nonresident parent's identity including the dates and locations of marriages and divorces; dates and locations of any legal proceedings regarding paternity; date and place of the child's birth; nonresident parent's full legal name; nonresident parent's date of birth, or if the nonresident parent's date of birth is unknown, an approximate age; the nonresident parent's Social Security number; the nonresident parent's whereabouts including last known whereabouts; and the whereabouts of relatives of the nonresident parent. For purposes of this subdivision, "nonresident parent" means a parent who does not reside in the same household as the child or did not reside in the same household as the child at the time the child was removed when the child is in foster care; (2) obtaining information that will identify and locate the nonresident parent from the county and state of Minnesota child support enforcement information system; (3) requesting a search of the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry 30 days after the child's birth; and (4) using any other reasonable means to identify and locate the nonresident parent. (b) The agency may disclose data which is otherwise private under section 13.46 or chapter 260E in order to carry out its duties under this subdivision. (c) Upon the filing of a petition alleging the child to be in need of protection or services, the responsible social services agency may contact a putative father who registered with the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry more than 30 days after the child's birth. The social service agency may consider a putative father for the day-to-day care of the child under section 260C.219 if the putative father cooperates with genetic testing and there is a positive test result under section 257.62, subdivision 5. Nothing in this paragraph: (1) relieves a putative father who registered with the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry more than 30 days after the child's birth of the duty to cooperate with paternity establishment proceedings under section 260C.219; (2) gives a putative father who registered with the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry more than 30 days after the child's birth the right to notice under section 260C.151 unless the putative father is entitled to notice under sections 259.24 and 259.49, subdivision 1, paragraph (a) or (b), clauses (1) to (7); or (3) establishes a right to assert an interest in the child in a termination of parental rights proceeding contrary to section 259.52, subdivision 6, unless the putative father is entitled to notice under sections 259.24 and 259.49, subdivision 1, paragraph (a) or (b), clauses (1) to (7). Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.178, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Hearing and release requirements. (a) If a child was taken into custody under section 260C.175, subdivision 1, clause (1) or (2), item (ii), the court shall hold a hearing within 72 hours of the time that the child was taken into custody, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, to determine whether the child should continue to be in custody. (b) Unless there is reason to believe that the child would endanger self or others or not return for a court hearing, or that the child's health or welfare would be immediately endangered, the child shall be released to the custody of a parent, guardian, custodian, or other suitable person, subject to reasonable conditions of release including, but not limited to, a requirement that the child undergo a chemical use assessment as provided in section 260C.157, subdivision 1. (c) If the court determines that there is reason to believe that the child would endanger self or others or not return for a court hearing, or that the child's health or welfare would be immediately endangered if returned to the care of the parent or guardian who has custody and from whom the child was removed, the court shall order the child: (1) into the care of the child's noncustodial parent and order the noncustodial parent to comply with any conditions that the court determines appropriate to ensure the safety and care of the child, including requiring the noncustodial parent to cooperate with paternity establishment proceedings if the noncustodial parent has not been adjudicated the child's father; or (2) into foster care as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 18, under the legal responsibility of the responsible social services agency or responsible probation or corrections agency for the purposes of protective care as that term is used in the juvenile court rules. The court shall not give the responsible social services legal custody and order a trial home visit at any time prior to adjudication and disposition under section 260C.201, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (3), but may order the child returned to the care of the parent or guardian who has custody and from whom the child was removed and order the parent or guardian to comply with any conditions the court determines to be appropriate to meet the safety, health, and welfare of the child. (d) In determining whether the child's health or welfare would be immediately endangered, the court shall consider whether the child would reside with a perpetrator of domestic child abuse. (e) The court, before determining whether a child should be placed in or continue in foster care under the protective care of the responsible agency, shall also make a determination, consistent with section 260.012 as to whether reasonable efforts were made to prevent placement or whether reasonable efforts to prevent placement are not required. In the case of an Indian child, the court shall determine whether active efforts, according to section 260.762 and the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, United States Code, title 25, section 1912(d), were made to prevent placement. The court shall enter a finding that the responsible social services agency has made reasonable efforts to prevent placement when the agency establishes either: (1) that the agency has actually provided services or made efforts in an attempt to prevent the child's removal but that such services or efforts have not proven sufficient to permit the child to safely remain in the home; or (2) that there are no services or other efforts that could be made at the time of the hearing that could safely permit the child to remain home or to return home. The court shall not make a reasonable efforts determination under this clause unless the court is satisfied that the agency has sufficiently demonstrated to the court that there were no services or other efforts that the agency was able to provide at the time of the hearing enabling the child to safely remain home or to safely return home. When reasonable efforts to prevent placement are required and there are services or other efforts that could be ordered that would permit the child to safely return home, the court shall order the child returned to the care of the parent or guardian and the services or efforts put in place to ensure the child's safety. When the court makes a prima facie determination that one of the circumstances under paragraph (g) exists, the court shall determine that reasonable efforts to prevent placement and to return the child to the care of the parent or guardian are not required. (f) If the court finds the social services agency's preventive or reunification efforts have not been reasonable but further preventive or reunification efforts could not permit the child to safely remain at home, the court may nevertheless authorize or continue the removal of the child. (g) The court may not order or continue the foster care placement of the child unless the court makes explicit, individualized findings that continued custody of the child by the parent or guardian would be contrary to the welfare of the child and that placement is in the best interest of the child. (h) At the emergency removal hearing, or at any time during the course of the proceeding, and upon notice and request of the county attorney, the court shall determine whether a petition has been filed stating a prima facie case that: (1) the parent has subjected a child to egregious harm as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 14; (2) the parental rights of the parent to another child have been involuntarily terminated; (3) the child is an abandoned infant under section 260C.301, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2); (4) the parents' custodial rights to another child have been involuntarily transferred to a relative under a juvenile protection proceeding or a similar process of another jurisdiction; (5) the parent has committed sexual abuse as defined in section 260E.03, against the child or another child of the parent; (6) the parent has committed an offense that requires registration as a predatory offender under section 243.166, subdivision 1b, paragraph (a) or (b); or (7) the provision of services or further services for the purpose of reunification is futile and therefore unreasonable. (i) When a petition to terminate parental rights is required under section 260C.301, subdivision 4, or 260C.503, subdivision 2, but the county attorney has determined not to proceed with a termination of parental rights petition, and has instead filed a petition to transfer permanent legal and physical custody to a relative under section 260C.507, the court shall schedule a permanency hearing within 30 days of the filing of the petition. (j) If the county attorney has filed a petition under section 260C.307, the court shall schedule a trial under section 260C.163 within 90 days of the filing of the petition except when the county attorney determines that the criminal case shall proceed to trial first under section 260C.503, subdivision 2, paragraph (c). (k) If the court determines the child should be ordered into foster care deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin , the court shall inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761; their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10; and the responsible social services agency's initial relative search efforts. Ifnew text end the child's parent refuses to give information to the responsible social services agency regarding the child's father or relatives of the child, the court may order the parent to disclose the names, addresses, telephone numbers, and other identifying information to the responsible social services agency for the purpose of complying with sections 260C.150, 260C.151, 260C.212, 260C.215, 260C.219, and 260C.221. (l) If a child ordered into foster care has siblings, whether full, half, or step, who are also ordered into foster care, the court shall inquire of the responsible social services agency of the efforts to place the children together as required by section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), if placement together is in each child's best interests, unless a child is in placement for treatment or a child is placed with a previously noncustodial parent who is not a parent to all siblings. If the children are not placed together at the time of the hearing, the court shall inquire at each subsequent hearing of the agency's reasonable efforts to place the siblings together, as required under section 260.012. If any sibling is not placed with another sibling or siblings, the agency must develop a plan to facilitate visitation or ongoing contact among the siblings as required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1, unless it is contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings to do so. (m) When the court has ordered the child into the care of a noncustodial parent or in foster care, the court may order a chemical dependency evaluation, mental health evaluation, medical examination, and parenting assessment for the parent as necessary to support the development of a plan for reunification required under subdivision 7 and section 260C.212, subdivision 1, or the child protective services plan under section 260E.26, and Minnesota Rules, part 9560.0228. (n) When the court has ordered an Indian child into an emergency child placement, the Indian child shall be placed according to the placement preferences in the Minnesota Indian Family Preservation Act, section 260.773. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.178, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Case plan. (a) When the court has ordered the child into the care of a parent under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (1), the child protective services plan under section 260E.26 must be filed within 30 days of the filing of the juvenile protection petition under section 260C.141, subdivision 1. (b) When the court orders the child into foster care under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (2), and not into the care of a parent, an out-of-home placement plannew text begin summarynew text end required under section 260C.212new text begin , subdivision 1,new text end must be filed with the court within 30 days of the filing of a juvenile protection petition under section 260C.141, subdivision 1, when the court orders emergency removal of the child under this section, or filed with the petition if the petition is a review of a voluntary placement under section 260C.141, subdivision 2.new text begin An out-of-home placement plan shall be prepared and filed with the court within 60 days after any child is placed in foster care under section 260C.212, subdivision 1.new text end (c) Upon the filing of the child protective services plan under section 260E.26 or out-of-home placement plan that has been developed jointly with the parent and in consultation with others as required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1, the court may approve implementation of the plan by the responsible social services agency based on the allegations contained in the petition and any evaluations, examinations, or assessments conducted under subdivision 1, paragraph (m). The court shall send written notice of the approval of the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan to all parties and the county attorney or may state such approval on the record at a hearing. A parent may agree to comply with the terms of the plan filed with the court. (d) The responsible social services agency shall make reasonable efforts to engage both parents of the child in case planning. The responsible social services agency shall report the results of its efforts to engage the child's parents in the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan filed with the court. The agency shall notify the court of the services it will provide or efforts it will attempt under the plan notwithstanding the parent's refusal to cooperate or disagreement with the services. The parent may ask the court to modify the plan to require different or additional services requested by the parent, but which the agency refused to provide. The court may approve the plan as presented by the agency or may modify the plan to require services requested by the parent. The court's approval must be based on the content of the petition. (e) Unless the parent agrees to comply with the terms of the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan, the court may not order a parent to comply with the provisions of the plan until the court finds the child is in need of protection or services and orders disposition under section 260C.201, subdivision 1. However, the court may find that the responsible social services agency has made reasonable efforts for reunification if the agency makes efforts to implement the terms of the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan approved under this section. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.201, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Dispositions. (a) If the court finds that the child is in need of protection or services or neglected and in foster care, the court shall enter an order making any of the following dispositions of the case: (1) place the child under the protective supervision of the responsible social services agency or child-placing agency in the home of a parent of the child under conditions prescribed by the court directed to the correction of the child's need for protection or services: (i) the court may order the child into the home of a parent who does not otherwise have legal custody of the child, however, an order under this section does not confer legal custody on that parent; (ii) if the court orders the child into the home of a father who is not adjudicated, the father must cooperate with paternity establishment proceedings regarding the child in the appropriate jurisdiction as one of the conditions prescribed by the court for the child to continue in the father's home; and (iii) the court may order the child into the home of a noncustodial parent with conditions and may also order both the noncustodial and the custodial parent to comply with the requirements of a case plan under subdivision 2; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) transfer legal custody to one of the following: (i) a child-placing agency; or (ii) the responsible social services agency. In making a foster care placement of a child whose custody has been transferred under this subdivision, new text begin the court shall inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, and new text end the agency shall make an individualized determination of how the placement is in the child's best interests using the placement consideration order for relatives and the best interest factors in section 260C.212, subdivision 2, and may include a child colocated with a parent in a licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program under section 260C.190; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) order a trial home visit without modifying the transfer of legal custody to the responsible social services agency under clause (2). Trial home visit means the child is returned to the care of the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed for a period not to exceed six months. During the period of the trial home visit, the responsible social services agency: (i) shall continue to have legal custody of the child, which means that the agency may see the child in the parent's home, at school, in a child care facility, or other setting as the agency deems necessary and appropriate; (ii) shall continue to have the ability to access information under section 260C.208; (iii) shall continue to provide appropriate services to both the parent and the child during the period of the trial home visit; (iv) without previous court order or authorization, may terminate the trial home visit in order to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare and may remove the child to foster care; (v) shall advise the court and parties within three days of the termination of the trial home visit when a visit is terminated by the responsible social services agency without a court order; and (vi) shall prepare a report for the court when the trial home visit is terminated whether by the agency or court order that describes the child's circumstances during the trial home visit and recommends appropriate orders, if any, for the court to enter to provide for the child's safety and stability. In the event a trial home visit is terminated by the agency by removing the child to foster care without prior court order or authorization, the court shall conduct a hearing within ten days of receiving notice of the termination of the trial home visit by the agency and shall order disposition under this subdivision or commence permanency proceedings under sections 260C.503 to 260C.515. The time period for the hearing may be extended by the court for good cause shown and if it is in the best interests of the child as long as the total time the child spends in foster care without a permanency hearing does not exceed 12 months; (4) if the child has been adjudicated as a child in need of protection or services because the child is in need of special services or care to treat or ameliorate a physical or mental disability or emotional disturbance as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, the court may order the child's parent, guardian, or custodian to provide it. The court may order the child's health plan company to provide mental health services to the child. Section 62Q.535 applies to an order for mental health services directed to the child's health plan company. If the health plan, parent, guardian, or custodian fails or is unable to provide this treatment or care, the court may order it provided. Absent specific written findings by the court that the child's disability is the result of abuse or neglect by the child's parent or guardian, the court shall not transfer legal custody of the child for the purpose of obtaining special treatment or care solely because the parent is unable to provide the treatment or care. If the court's order for mental health treatment is based on a diagnosis made by a treatment professional, the court may order that the diagnosing professional not provide the treatment to the child if it finds that such an order is in the child's best interests; or (5) if the court believes that the child has sufficient maturity and judgment and that it is in the best interests of the child, the court may order a child 16 years old or older to be allowed to live independently, either alone or with others as approved by the court under supervision the court considers appropriate, if the county board, after consultation with the court, has specifically authorized this dispositional alternative for a child. (b) If the child was adjudicated in need of protection or services because the child is a runaway or habitual truant, the court may order any of the following dispositions in addition to or as alternatives to the dispositions authorized under paragraph (a): (1) counsel the child or the child's parents, guardian, or custodian; (2) place the child under the supervision of a probation officer or other suitable person in the child's own home under conditions prescribed by the court, including reasonable rules for the child's conduct and the conduct of the parents, guardian, or custodian, designed for the physical, mental, and moral well-being and behavior of the child; (3) subject to the court's supervision, transfer legal custody of the child to one of the following: (i) a reputable person of good moral character. No person may receive custody of two or more unrelated children unless licensed to operate a residential program under sections 245A.01 to 245A.16; or (ii) a county probation officer for placement in a group foster home established under the direction of the juvenile court and licensed pursuant to section 241.021; (4) require the child to pay a fine of up to $100. The court shall order payment of the fine in a manner that will not impose undue financial hardship upon the child; (5) require the child to participate in a community service project; (6) order the child to undergo a chemical dependency evaluation and, if warranted by the evaluation, order participation by the child in a drug awareness program or an inpatient or outpatient chemical dependency treatment program; (7) if the court believes that it is in the best interests of the child or of public safety that the child's driver's license or instruction permit be canceled, the court may order the commissioner of public safety to cancel the child's license or permit for any period up to the child's 18th birthday. If the child does not have a driver's license or permit, the court may order a denial of driving privileges for any period up to the child's 18th birthday. The court shall forward an order issued under this clause to the commissioner, who shall cancel the license or permit or deny driving privileges without a hearing for the period specified by the court. At any time before the expiration of the period of cancellation or denial, the court may, for good cause, order the commissioner of public safety to allow the child to apply for a license or permit, and the commissioner shall so authorize; (8) order that the child's parent or legal guardian deliver the child to school at the beginning of each school day for a period of time specified by the court; or (9) require the child to perform any other activities or participate in any other treatment programs deemed appropriate by the court. To the extent practicable, the court shall enter a disposition order the same day it makes a finding that a child is in need of protection or services or neglected and in foster care, but in no event more than 15 days after the finding unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting a delay. If the child was under eight years of age at the time the petition was filed, the disposition order must be entered within ten days of the finding and the court may not grant a delay unless good cause is shown and the court finds the best interests of the child will be served by the delay. (c) If a child who is 14 years of age or older is adjudicated in need of protection or services because the child is a habitual truant and truancy procedures involving the child were previously dealt with by a school attendance review board or county attorney mediation program under section 260A.06 or 260A.07, the court shall order a cancellation or denial of driving privileges under paragraph (b), clause (7), for any period up to the child's 18th birthday. (d) In the case of a child adjudicated in need of protection or services because the child has committed domestic abuse and been ordered excluded from the child's parent's home, the court shall dismiss jurisdiction if the court, at any time, finds the parent is able or willing to provide an alternative safe living arrangement for the child as defined in paragraph (f). (e) When a parent has complied with a case plan ordered under subdivision 6 and the child is in the care of the parent, the court may order the responsible social services agency to monitor the parent's continued ability to maintain the child safely in the home under such terms and conditions as the court determines appropriate under the circumstances. (f) For the purposes of this subdivision, "alternative safe living arrangement" means a living arrangement for a child proposed by a petitioning parent or guardian if a court excludes the minor from the parent's or guardian's home that is separate from the victim of domestic abuse and safe for the child respondent. A living arrangement proposed by a petitioning parent or guardian is presumed to be an alternative safe living arrangement absent information to the contrary presented to the court. In evaluating any proposed living arrangement, the court shall consider whether the arrangement provides the child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, and education in a safe environment. Any proposed living arrangement that would place the child in the care of an adult who has been physically or sexually violent is presumed unsafe. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.201, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Written findings. (a) Any order for a disposition authorized under this section shall contain written findings of fact to support the disposition and case plan ordered and shall also set forth in writing the following information: (1) why the best interests and safety of the child are served by the disposition and case plan ordered; (2) what alternative dispositions or services under the case plan were considered by the court and why such dispositions or services were not appropriate in the instant case; (3) when legal custody of the child is transferred, the appropriateness of the particular placement made or to be made by the placing agency using the relative and sibling placement considerations and best interest factors in section 260C.212, subdivision 2, or the appropriateness of a child colocated with a parent in a licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program under section 260C.190; (4) whether reasonable efforts to finalize the permanent plan for the child consistent with section 260.012 were made including reasonable efforts: (i) to prevent the child's placement and to reunify the child with the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed at the earliest time consistent with the child's safety. The court's findings must include a brief description of what preventive and reunification efforts were made and why further efforts could not have prevented or eliminated the necessity of removal or that reasonable efforts were not required under section 260.012 or 260C.178, subdivision 1; (ii) to identify and locate any noncustodial or nonresident parent of the child and to assess such parent's ability to provide day-to-day care of the child, and, where appropriate, provide services necessary to enable the noncustodial or nonresident parent to safely provide day-to-day care of the child as required under section 260C.219, unless such services are not required under section 260.012 or 260C.178, subdivision 1. The court's findings must include a description of the agency's efforts to: (A) identify and locate the child's noncustodial or nonresident parent; (B) assess the noncustodial or nonresident parent's ability to provide day-to-day care of the child; and (C) if appropriate, provide services necessary to enable the noncustodial or nonresident parent to safely provide the child's day-to-day care, including efforts to engage the noncustodial or nonresident parent in assuming care and responsibility of the child; (iii) tonew text begin inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, andnew text end make the diligent search for relatives and provide the notices required under section 260C.221; a finding made pursuant to a hearing under section 260C.202 that the agency has made diligent efforts to conduct a relative search and has appropriately engaged relatives who responded to the notice under section 260C.221 and other relatives, who came to the attention of the agency after notice under section 260C.221 was sent, in placement and case planning decisions fulfills the requirement of this item; (iv) to identify and make a foster care placement of the child, considering the order in section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), in the home of an unlicensed relative, according to the requirements of section 142B.06, a licensed relative, or other licensed foster care provider, who will commit to being the permanent legal parent or custodian for the child in the event reunification cannot occur, but who will actively support the reunification plan for the child. If the court finds that the agency has not appropriately considered relatives for placement of the child, the court shall order the agency to comply with section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a). The court may order the agency to continue considering relatives for placement of the child regardless of the child's current placement setting; and (v) to place siblings together in the same home or to ensure visitation is occurring when siblings are separated in foster care placement and visitation is in the siblings' best interests under section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (d); and (5) if the child has been adjudicated as a child in need of protection or services because the child is in need of special services or care to treat or ameliorate a mental disability or emotional disturbance as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, the written findings shall also set forth: (i) whether the child has mental health needs that must be addressed by the case plan; (ii) what consideration was given to the diagnostic and functional assessments performed by the child's mental health professional and to health and mental health care professionals' treatment recommendations; (iii) what consideration was given to the requests or preferences of the child's parent or guardian with regard to the child's interventions, services, or treatment; and (iv) what consideration was given to the cultural appropriateness of the child's treatment or services. (b) If the court finds that the social services agency's preventive or reunification efforts have not been reasonable but that further preventive or reunification efforts could not permit the child to safely remain at home, the court may nevertheless authorize or continue the removal of the child. (c) If the child has been identified by the responsible social services agency as the subject of concurrent permanency planning, the court shall review the reasonable efforts of the agency to develop a permanency plan for the child that includes a primary plan that is for reunification with the child's parent or guardian and a secondary plan that is for an alternative, legally permanent home for the child in the event reunification cannot be achieved in a timely manner. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.202, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Court review for a child placed in foster care. (a) If the court orders a child placed in foster care, the court shall review the out-of-home placement plan and the child's placement at least every 90 days as required in juvenile court rules to determine whether continued out-of-home placement is necessary and appropriate or whether the child should be returned home. (b) This review is not required if the court has returned the child home, ordered the child permanently placed away from the parent under sections 260C.503 to 260C.521, or terminated rights under section 260C.301. Court review for a child permanently placed away from a parent, including where the child is under guardianship of the commissioner, is governed by section 260C.607. (c) When a child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program setting as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d, the responsible social services agency must submit evidence to the court as specified in section 260C.712. (d) No later than three months after the child's placement in foster care, the court shall review agency efforts to search for and notify relatives pursuant to section 260C.221, and order that the agency's efforts begin immediately, or continue, if the agency has failed to perform, or has not adequately performed, the duties under that section. The court must order the agency to continue to appropriately engage relatives who responded to the notice under section 260C.221 in placement and case planning decisions and to consider relatives for foster care placement consistent with section 260C.221. Notwithstanding a court's finding that the agency has made reasonable efforts to search for and notify relatives under section 260C.221, the court may order the agency to continue making reasonable efforts to search for, notify, engage, and consider relatives who came to the agency's attention after sending the initial notice under section 260C.221. (e) The court shall review the out-of-home placement plan and may modify the plan as provided under section 260C.201, subdivisions 6 and 7. (f) When the court transfers the custody of a child to a responsible social services agency resulting in foster care or protective supervision with a noncustodial parent under subdivision 1, the court shall notify the parents of the provisions of sections 260C.204 and 260C.503 to 260C.521, as required under juvenile court rules. deleted text begin (g) When a child remains in or returns to foster care pursuant to section 260C.451 and the court has jurisdiction pursuant to section 260C.193, subdivision 6, paragraph (c), the court shall at least annually conduct the review required under section 260C.203. deleted text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.202, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Court review prior to the 18th birthday of a child in foster care. new text end new text begin (a) The court must conduct a review during the 90-day period prior to the 18th birthday of a child in foster care. new text end new text begin (b) The responsible social services agency must file a written report with the court containing or attaching the following: new text end new text begin (1) the child's name, date of birth, race, gender, and current address; new text end new text begin (2) whether the child is eligible for extended foster care and if not, the reason or reasons why the child is not eligible; new text end new text begin (3) a written summary describing how the child was involved in creating the child's plan for after their 18th birthday; new text end new text begin (4) the date the required extended foster care eligibility notice in section 260C.451, subdivision 1, was provided and the child's plan after the child's 18th birthday; new text end new text begin (5) the child's most recent independent living plan required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (6) if the agency's recommendation is to extend jurisdiction up to age 19 under section 260C.193, why the extended jurisdiction is in the child's best interest; new text end new text begin (7) if the agency's recommendation is to reunify the child with their parent or legal guardian, why reunification is in the child's best interest; new text end new text begin (8) if the agency plans to transition the child into adult services on or after the child's 18th birthday, a summary of the transition plan as required in section 260C.452 and how this plan is in the child's best interest; and new text end new text begin (9) if the child's plan is to leave foster care at age 18 and not continue in extended foster care, a copy of their 180-day transition plan required in section 260C.452 and the reasons the child is not continuing in extended foster care. new text end new text begin (c) The agency must inform the child and parties to the proceeding of the reporting and court review requirements of this subdivision and their right to request a hearing. The child or a party to the proceeding may request a hearing if they believe the agency did not make reasonable efforts under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (d) Upon receiving the report, the court must hold a hearing when a party to the proceeding or the child requests a hearing. In all other circumstances, the court has the discretion to hold a hearing or issue an order without a hearing. new text end new text begin (e) The court must issue an order with findings including but not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) whether the responsible social services agency provided the notice to the child about extended foster care as required in section 260C.451; new text end new text begin (2) whether the responsible social services agency engaged with the child and appropriately planned with the child to transition to adulthood; and new text end new text begin (3) if the child has decided to not continue in the extended foster care program at age 18, whether the responsible social services agency informed the child that they can reenter extended foster care up to age 21 or that the child is not eligible to reenter and why. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.202, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Court reviews for a child over age 18 in foster care. new text end new text begin When a child remains in or returns to foster care pursuant to section 260C.451 and the court has jurisdiction pursuant to section 260C.193, subdivision 6, paragraph (c), the court must at least annually conduct the review required under section 260C.203. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.204, is amended to read: 260C.204 PERMANENCY PROGRESS REVIEW FOR CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE FOR SIX MONTHS. (a) When a child continues in placement out of the home of the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed, no later than six months after the child's placement the court shall conduct a permanency progress hearing to review: (1) the progress of the case, the parent's progress on the case plan or out-of-home placement plan, whichever is applicable; (2) the agency's reasonable, or in the case of an Indian child, active efforts for reunification and its provision of services; (3) the agency's reasonable efforts to finalize the permanent plan for the child under section 260.012, paragraph (e), and to make a placement as required under section 260C.212, subdivision 2, in a home that will commit to being the legally permanent family for the child in the event the child cannot return home according to the timelines in this section; and (4) in the case of an Indian child, active efforts to prevent the breakup of the Indian family and to make a placement according to the placement preferences under United States Code, title 25, chapter 21, section 1915. (b) When a child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program setting as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d, the responsible social services agency must submit evidence to the court as specified in section 260C.712. (c) The court shall ensure that notice of the hearing is sent to any relative who: (1) responded to the agency's notice provided under section 260C.221, indicating an interest in participating in planning for the child or being a permanency resource for the child and who has kept the court apprised of the relative's address; or (2) asked to be notified of court proceedings regarding the child as is permitted in section 260C.152, subdivision 5. (d)(1) If the parent or guardian has maintained contact with the child and is complying with the court-ordered out-of-home placement plan, and if the child would benefit from reunification with the parent, the court may either: (i) return the child home, if the conditions that led to the out-of-home placement have been sufficiently mitigated that it is safe and in the child's best interests to return home; or (ii) continue the matter up to a total of six additional months. If the child has not returned home by the end of the additional six months, the court must conduct a hearing according to sections 260C.503 to 260C.521. (2) If the court determines that the parent or guardian is not complying, is not making progress with or engaging with services in the out-of-home placement plan, or is not maintaining regular contact with the child as outlined in the visitation plan required as part of the out-of-home placement plan under section 260C.212, the court may order the responsible social services agency: (i) to develop a plan for legally permanent placement of the child away from the parent; (ii) to consider, identify, recruit, and support one or more permanency resources from the child's relatives and foster parent, consistent with new text begin clause (3) and new text end section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), to be the legally permanent home in the event the child cannot be returned to the parent. Any relative or the child's foster parent may ask the court to order the agency to consider them for permanent placement of the child in the event the child cannot be returned to the parent. A relative or foster parent who wants to be considered under this item shall cooperate with the background study required under section 245C.08, if the individual has not already done so, and with the home study process required under chapter 142B for providing child foster care and for adoption under section 259.41. The home study referred to in this item shall be a single-home study in the form required by the commissioner of children, youth, and families or similar study required by the individual's state of residence when the subject of the study is not a resident of Minnesota. The court may order the responsible social services agency to make a referral under the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children when necessary to obtain a home study for an individual who wants to be considered for transfer of permanent legal and physical custody or adoption of the child; and (iii) to file a petition to support an order for the legally permanent placement plan. new text begin (3) Consistent with section 260C.223, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), the responsible social services agency must not define a foster family as the permanent home for a child until: new text end new text begin (i) inquiry and Tribal notice requirements under section 260.761, subdivisions 1 and 2, are satisfied; new text end new text begin (ii) inquiry about the child's heritage, including their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, has been completed; and new text end new text begin (iii) the court has determined that reasonable or active efforts toward completing the relative search requirements in section 260C.221 have been made. new text end (e) Following the review under this section: (1) if the court has either returned the child home or continued the matter up to a total of six additional months, the agency shall continue to provide services to support the child's return home or to make reasonable efforts to achieve reunification of the child and the parent as ordered by the court under an approved case plan; (2) if the court orders the agency to develop a plan for the transfer of permanent legal and physical custody of the child to a relative, a petition supporting the plan shall be filed in juvenile court within 30 days of the hearing required under this section and a trial on the petition held within 60 days of the filing of the pleadings; or (3) if the court orders the agency to file a termination of parental rights, unless the county attorney can show cause why a termination of parental rights petition should not be filed, a petition for termination of parental rights shall be filed in juvenile court within 30 days of the hearing required under this section and a trial on the petition held within 60 days of the filing of the petition. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.212, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Out-of-home placement; plan. deleted text begin (a) An out-of-home placement plan shall be prepared within 30 days after any child is placed in foster care by court order or a deleted text end deleted text begin voluntary placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the child's parent pursuant to section 260C.227 or chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 260D deleted text end deleted text begin . deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (a)new text end An out-of-home placement plan means a written document individualized to the needs of the child and the child's parents or guardians that is prepared by the responsible social services agencynew text begin using a form developed by the commissioner. The plan must be completednew text end jointly with the child's parents or guardians and in consultation with the child's guardian ad litem; the child's tribe, if the child is an Indian child; the child's foster parent or representative of the foster care facility; and, when appropriate, the child. When a child is age 14 or older, the child may include two other individuals on the team preparing the child's out-of-home placement plan. The child may select one member of the case planning team to be designated as the child's advisor and to advocate with respect to the application of the reasonable and prudent parenting standards. The responsible social services agency may reject an individual selected by the child if the agency has good cause to believe that the individual would not act in the best interest of the child. For a child in voluntary foster care for treatment under chapter 260D, preparation of the out-of-home placement plan shall additionally include the child's mental health treatment provider. For a child 18 years of age or older, the responsible social services agency shall involve the child and the child's parents as appropriate. As appropriate, the plan shall be: (1) submitted to the court for approval under section 260C.178, subdivision 7; (2) ordered by the court, either as presented or modified after hearing, under section 260C.178, subdivision 7, or 260C.201, subdivision 6; and (3) signed by the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the child's guardian ad litem, a representative of the child's tribe, the responsible social services agency, and, if possible, the child. new text begin (b) Before an out-of-home placement plan is signed by the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the responsible social services agency must provide the parent or parents or guardian with a one- to two-page summary of the plan using a form developed by the commissioner. The out-of-home placement plan summary must clearly summarize the plan's contents under paragraph (d) and list the requirements and responsibilities for the parent or parents or guardian using plain language. The summary must be updated and provided to the parent or parents or guardian when the out-of-home placement plan is updated under subdivision 1a. new text end new text begin (c) An out-of-home placement plan summary shall be prepared within 30 days after any child is placed in foster care by court order or voluntary placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the child's parent pursuant to section 260C.227 or chapter 260D. An out-of-home placement plan shall be prepared within 60 days after any child is placed in foster care by court order or a voluntary placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the child's parent pursuant to section 260C.227 or chapter 260D. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The out-of-home placement plan shall be explained by the responsible social services agency to all persons involved in the plan's implementation, including the child who has signed the plan, and shall set forth: (1) a description of the foster care home or facility selected, including how the out-of-home placement plan is designed to achieve a safe placement for the child in the least restrictive, most family-like setting available that is in close proximity to the home of the child's parents or guardians when the case plan goal is reunification; and how the placement is consistent with the best interests and special needs of the child according to the factors under subdivision 2, paragraph (b); new text begin (2) a description of the services offered and provided to prevent removal of the child from the home; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the specific reasons for the placement of the child in foster care, and when reunification is the plan, a description of the problems or conditions in the home of the parent or parents that necessitated removal of the child from home and new text begin the services offered and provided to support new text end the changes the parent or parents must make for the child to safely return homedeleted text begin ;deleted text end deleted text begin (3) a description of the services offered and provided to prevent removal of the child from the homedeleted text end and to reunify the family including: (i) the specific actions to be taken by the parent or parents of the child to eliminate or correct the problems or conditions identified in clause (2), and the time period during which the actions are to be taken; and (ii) the reasonable efforts, or in the case of an Indian child, active efforts to be made to achieve a safe and stable home for the child including social and other supportive services to be provided or offered to the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the child, and the residential facility during the period the child is in the residential facility; (4) a description of any services or resources that were requested by the child or the child's parent, guardian, foster parent, or custodian since the date of the child's placement in the residential facility, and whether those services or resources were provided and if not, the basis for the denial of the services or resources; (5) the visitation plan for the parent or parents or guardian, other relatives as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26b or 27, and siblings of the child if the siblings are not placed together in foster care, and whether visitation is consistent with the best interest of the child, during the period the child is in foster care; (6) when a child cannot return to or be in the care of either parent, documentation of steps to finalize new text begin permanency through either:new text end new text begin (i) new text end adoption as the permanency plan for the child through reasonable efforts to place the child for adoption pursuant to section 260C.605. At a minimum, the documentation must include consideration of whether adoption is in the best interests of the child and child-specific recruitment efforts such as a relative search, consideration of relatives for adoptive placement, and the use of state, regional, and national adoption exchanges to facilitate orderly and timely placements in and outside of the state. A copy of this documentation shall be provided to the court in the review required under section 260C.317, subdivision 3, paragraph (b);new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (7) when a child cannot return to or be in the care of either parent, documentation of steps to finalizedeleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end the transfer of permanent legal and physical custody to a relative as the permanency plan for the child. This documentation must support the requirements of the kinship placement agreement under section 142A.605 and must include the reasonable efforts used to determine that it is not appropriate for the child to return home or be adopted, and reasons why permanent placement with a relative through a Northstar kinship assistance arrangement is in the child's best interest; how the child meets the eligibility requirements for Northstar kinship assistance payments; agency efforts to discuss adoption with the child's relative foster parent and reasons why the relative foster parent chose not to pursue adoption, if applicable; and agency efforts to discuss with the child's parent or parents the permanent transfer of permanent legal and physical custody or the reasons why these efforts were not made; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end efforts to ensure the child's educational stability while in foster care for a child who attained the minimum age for compulsory school attendance under state law and is enrolled full time in elementary or secondary school, or instructed in elementary or secondary education at home, or instructed in an independent study elementary or secondary program, or incapable of attending school on a full-time basis due to a medical condition that is documented and supported by regularly updated information in the child's case plan. Educational stability efforts include: (i) efforts to ensure that the child remains in the same school in which the child was enrolled prior to placement or upon the child's move from one placement to another, including efforts to work with the local education authorities to ensure the child's educational stability and attendance; or (ii) if it is not in the child's best interest to remain in the same school that the child was enrolled in prior to placement or move from one placement to another, efforts to ensure immediate and appropriate enrollment for the child in a new school; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end the educational records of the child including the most recent information available regarding: (i) the names and addresses of the child's educational providers; (ii) the child's grade level performance; (iii) the child's school record; (iv) a statement about how the child's placement in foster care takes into account proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement; and (v) any other relevant educational information; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end the efforts by the responsible social services agency to deleted text begin ensuredeleted text end new text begin support the child's well-being by ensuringnew text end the oversight and continuity of health care services for the foster childnew text begin and documenting their health recordnew text end , including: (i) the plan to schedule the child's initial health screens; (ii) how the child's known medical problems and identified needs from the screens, including any known communicable diseases, as defined in section 144.4172, subdivision 2, shall be monitored and treated while the child is in foster care; (iii) how the child's medical information shall be updated and shared, including the child's immunizations; (iv) who is responsible to coordinate and respond to the child's health care needs, including the role of the parent, the agency, and the foster parent; (v) who is responsible for oversight of the child's prescription medications; (vi) how physicians or other appropriate medical and nonmedical professionals shall be consulted and involved in assessing the health and well-being of the child and determine the appropriate medical treatment for the child; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (vii) the responsibility to ensure that the child has access to medical care through either medical insurance or medical assistance;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (11) the health records of the child includingdeleted text end new text begin (viii)new text end information available regarding: deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (A)new text end the names and addresses of the child's health care and dental care providers; deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (B)new text end a record of the child's immunizations; deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (C)new text end the child's known medical problems, including any known communicable diseases as defined in section 144.4172, subdivision 2; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (D)new text end the child's medications; and deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (E)new text end any other relevant health care information such as the child's eligibility for medical insurance or medical assistance; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end an independent living plan for a child 14 years of age or older, developed in consultation with the child. The child may select one member of the case planning team to be designated as the child's advisor and to advocate with respect to the application of the reasonable and prudent parenting standards in subdivision 14. The plan should include, but not be limited to, the following objectives: (i) educational, vocational, or employment planning; (ii) health care planning and medical coverage; (iii) transportation including, where appropriate, assisting the child in obtaining a driver's license; (iv) money management, including the responsibility of the responsible social services agency to ensure that the child annually receives, at no cost to the child, a consumer report as defined under section 13C.001 and assistance in interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies in the report; (v) planning for housing; (vi) social and recreational skills; (vii) establishing and maintaining connections with the child's family and community; and (viii) regular opportunities to engage in age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities typical for the child's age group, taking into consideration the capacities of the individual child; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end for a child in voluntary foster care for treatment under chapter 260D, diagnostic and assessment information, specific services relating to meeting the mental health care needs of the child, and treatment outcomes; deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end for a child 14 years of age or older, a signed acknowledgment that describes the child's rights regarding education, health care, visitation, safety and protection from exploitation, and court participation; receipt of the documents identified in section 260C.452; and receipt of an annual credit report. The acknowledgment shall state that the rights were explained in an age-appropriate manner to the child; and deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end for a child placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the plan must include the requirements in section 260C.708. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The parent or parents or guardian and the child each shall have the right to legal counsel in the preparation of the case plan and shall be informed of the right at the time of placement of the child. The child shall also have the right to a guardian ad litem. If unable to employ counsel from their own resources, the court shall appoint counsel upon the request of the parent or parents or the child or the child's legal guardian. The parent or parents may also receive assistance from any person or social services agency in preparation of the case plan. deleted text begin (e) Before an out-of-home placement plan is signed by the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the responsible social services agency must provide the parent or parents or guardian with a one- to two-page summary of the plan using a form developed by the commissioner. The out-of-home placement plan summary must clearly summarize the plan's contents under paragraph (c) and list the requirements and responsibilities for the parent or deleted text end deleted text begin parents or guardian using plain language. The summary must be updated and provided to the parent or parents or guardian when the out-of-home placement plan is updated under subdivision 1a. deleted text end (f) After the plan has been agreed upon by the parties involved or approved or ordered by the court, the foster parents shall be fully informed of the provisions of the case plan and shall be provided a copy of the plan. (g) Upon the child's discharge from foster care, the responsible social services agency must provide the child's parent, adoptive parent, or permanent legal and physical custodian, and the child, if the child is 14 years of age or older, with a current copy of the child's health and education record. If a child meets the conditions in subdivision 15, paragraph (b), the agency must also provide the child with the child's social and medical history. The responsible social services agency may give a copy of the child's health and education record and social and medical history to a child who is younger than 14 years of age, if it is appropriate and if subdivision 15, paragraph (b), applies. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.212, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Out-of-home placement plan update. (a) Within 30 days of placing the child in foster care, the agency mustnew text begin complete the child's out-of-home placement plan summary and file it with the court. Within 60 days of placing the child in foster care, the agency mustnew text end file the child's initial out-of-home placement plan with the court. After filing the child's deleted text begin initialdeleted text end out-of-home placement plan, the agency shall update and file the child's out-of-home placement plan with the court as follows: (1) when the agency moves a child to a different foster care setting, the agency shall inform the court within 30 days of the child's placement change or court-ordered trial home visit. The agency must file the child's updatednew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan with the court at the next required review hearing; (2) when the agency places a child in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d, or moves a child from one qualified residential treatment program to a different qualified residential treatment program, the agency must update the child's out-of-home placement plan within 60 days. To meet the requirements of section 260C.708, the agency must file the child's out-of-home placement plan along with the agency's report seeking the court's approval of the child's placement at a qualified residential treatment program under section 260C.71. After the court issues an order, the agency must update the child's out-of-home placement plan to document the court's approval or disapproval of the child's placement in a qualified residential treatment program; (3) when the agency places a child with the child's parent in a licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program under section 260C.190, the agency must identify the treatment program where the child will be placed in the child's out-of-home placement plan prior to the child's placement. The agency must file the child'snew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan with the court at the next required review hearing; and (4) under sections 260C.227 and 260C.521, the agency must update the child'snew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan and file the child's out-of-home placement plan with the court. (b) When none of the items in paragraph (a) apply, the agency must update the child'snew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan no later than 180 days after the child's initial placement and every six months thereafter, consistent with section 260C.203, paragraph (a). Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.221, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Relative notice requirements. (a) The agency may provide oral or written notice to a child's relatives. In the child's case record, the agency must document providing the required notice to each of the child's relatives. The responsible social services agency must notify relatives: (1) of the need for a foster home for the child, the option to become a placement resource for the child, the order of placement that the agency will consider under section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), and the possibility of the need for a permanent placement for the child; (2) of their responsibility to keep the responsible social services agency and the court informed of their current address in order to receive notice in the event that a permanent placement is sought for the child and to receive notice of the permanency progress review hearing under section 260C.204. A relative who fails to provide a current address to the responsible social services agency and the court forfeits the right to receive notice of the possibility of permanent placement and of the permanency progress review hearing under section 260C.204, until the relative provides a current address to the responsible social services agency and the court. A decision by a relative not to be identified as a potential permanent placement resource or participate in planning for the child shall not affect whether the relative is considered for placement of, or as a permanency resource for, the child with that relative at any time in the case, and shall not be the sole basis for the court to rule out the relative as the child's placement or permanency resource; (3) that the relative may participate in the care and planning for the child, as specified in subdivision 3, including that the opportunity for such participation may be lost by failing to respond to the notice sent under this subdivision; (4) of the family foster care licensing and adoption home study requirementsnew text begin and supportsnew text end , including deleted text begin how to complete an application and how to request a variance from licensing standards that do not present a safety or health risk to the child in the home under section 142B.10 and supports that are available for relatives and children who reside in a family foster home;deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (i) the choice between county or private agency licensing and services under section 142B.05, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (ii) how to complete an application; new text end new text begin (iii) how to request a variance from licensing standards that do not present a safety or health risk to the child in the home under section 142B.10; and new text end new text begin (iv) supports that are available for relatives and children who reside in a family foster home, including but not limited to ways to include resource or substitute caregivers in the child's case plan, strategies for leveraging the child and family's natural supports, and how to access legal services and support and respite care; new text end (5) of the relatives' right to ask to be notified of any court proceedings regarding the child, to attend the hearings, and of a relative's right to be heard by the court as required under section 260C.152, subdivision 5; (6) that regardless of the relative's response to the notice sent under this subdivision, the agency is required to establish permanency for a child, including planning for alternative permanency options if the agency's reunification efforts fail or are not required; and (7) that by responding to the notice, a relative may receive information about participating in a child's family and permanency team if the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d. (b) The responsible social services agency shall send the notice required under paragraph (a) to relatives who become known to the responsible social services agency, except for relatives that the agency does not contact due to safety reasons under subdivision 5, paragraph (b). The responsible social services agency shall continue to send notice to relatives notwithstanding a court's finding that the agency has made reasonable efforts to conduct a relative search. (c) The responsible social services agency is not required to send the notice under paragraph (a) to a relative who becomes known to the agency after an adoption placement agreement has been fully executed under section 260C.613, subdivision 1. If the relative wishes to be considered for adoptive placement of the child, the agency shall inform the relative of the relative's ability to file a motion for an order for adoptive placement under section 260C.607, subdivision 6. Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.223, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Program; goals. (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish a program for concurrent permanency planning for child protection services. (b) Concurrent permanency planning involves a planning process for children who are placed out of the home of their parents pursuant to a court order, or who have been voluntarily placed out of the home by the parents for 60 days or more and who are not developmentally disabled or emotionally disabled under section 260C.212, subdivision 9. The responsible social services agency shall develop an alternative permanency plan while making reasonable efforts for reunification of the child with the family, if required by section 260.012. The goals of concurrent permanency planning are to: (1) achieve early permanency for children; (2) decrease children's length of stay in foster care and reduce the number of moves children experience in foster care; and (3) deleted text begin develop a group of familiesdeleted text end new text begin establish a foster parent for a childnew text end who will work deleted text begin towardsdeleted text end new text begin towardnew text end reunification and also serve as new text begin a new text end permanent deleted text begin familiesdeleted text end new text begin familynew text end for children. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.223, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Development of guidelines and protocols. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner shall establish guidelines and protocols for social services agencies involved in concurrent permanency planning, including criteria for conducting concurrent permanency planning based on relevant factors such as: (1) age of the child and duration of out-of-home placement; (2) prognosis for successful reunification with parents; (3) availability of relatives and other concerned individuals to provide support or a permanent placement for the child; and (4) special needs of the child and other factors affecting the child's best interests. new text begin (b) new text end In developing the guidelines and protocols, the commissioner shall consult with interest groups within the child protection system, including child protection workers, child protection advocates, county attorneys, law enforcement, community service organizations, the councils of color, and the ombudsperson for families. new text begin (c) The responsible social services agency must not make a foster family the permanent home for a child until: new text end new text begin (1) inquiry and Tribal notice requirements under section 260.761, subdivisions 1 and 2, are satisfied; new text end new text begin (2) inquiry about the child's heritage, including their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, has been completed; and new text end new text begin (3) the court has determined that reasonable or active efforts toward completing the relative search requirements in section 260C.221 have been made. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.329, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Petition. new text begin (a) new text end The new text begin following individuals may file a petition for the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship:new text end new text begin (1) new text end county attorneydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end a parent whose parental rights were terminated under a previous order of the courtdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) a parent whose voluntary consent to adoption was accepted by the court and: new text end new text begin (i) the identified prospective adoptive parent did not finalize the adoption; or new text end new text begin (ii) the adoption finalized but subsequently dissolved and the child returned to foster care and guardianship of the commissioner; new text end new text begin (4) new text end a child who is ten years of age or olderdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5)new text end the responsible social services agencydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or new text begin (6)new text end a guardian ad litem deleted text begin may file a petition for the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationshipdeleted text end . new text begin (b)new text end A parent filing a petition under this section shall pay a filing fee in the amount required under section 357.021, subdivision 2, clause (1). The filing fee may be waived pursuant to chapter 563. A petition for the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship may be filed when: (1) the parent has corrected the conditions that led to an order terminating parental rights; (2) the parent is willing and has the capability to provide day-to-day care and maintain the health, safety, and welfare of the child; (3) the child has been in foster care for at least 24 months after the court issued the order terminating parental rights; (4) the child deleted text begin hasdeleted text end new text begin isnew text end not deleted text begin beendeleted text end new text begin currentlynew text end adopted; and (5) the child is not the subject of a written adoption placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the prospective adoptive parent, as required under Minnesota Rules, part 9560.0060, subpart 2. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.329, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Hearing. The court may grant the petition ordering the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship only if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that: (1) reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship is in the child's best interests; (2) the child deleted text begin hasdeleted text end new text begin isnew text end not deleted text begin beendeleted text end new text begin currentlynew text end adopted; (3) the child is not the subject of a written adoption placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the prospective adoptive parent, as required under Minnesota Rules, part 9560.0060, subpart 2; (4) at least 24 months have elapsed following a final order terminating parental rights and the child remains in foster care; (5) the child desires to reside with the parent; (6) the parent has corrected the conditions that led to an order terminating parental rights; and (7) the parent is willing and has the capability to provide day-to-day care and maintain the health, safety, and welfare of the child. Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.451, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Administrative or court review of placements. (a) The court deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end conduct reviews at least annually to ensure the responsible social services agency is making reasonable efforts to finalize the permanency plan for the child. new text begin (b) The responsible social services agency must file a written report with the court containing or attaching the following: new text end new text begin (1) the child's name, date of birth, race, gender, and current address; new text end new text begin (2) a written summary describing planning with the child, including supports and services to ensure the child's safety, housing stability, well-being needs, and independent living skills; new text end new text begin (3) the child's most recent out-of-home placement plan and independent living plan required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (4) if the child's plan is to not continue in extended foster care or if the child will reach age 21 before the next review, a copy of their 180-day transition plan as required in section 260C.452, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (5) if the agency plans to transition the child into adult services, a summary of the transition plan as required in section 260C.452, subdivision 4, and how this plan is in the child's best interest. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The court deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end find that the responsible social services agency is making reasonable efforts to finalize the permanency plan for the child when the responsible social services agency: (1) provides appropriate support to the child and new text begin caregiver or new text end foster deleted text begin care providerdeleted text end new text begin parentnew text end to ensure continuing stability and success in placement; (2) works with the child to plan for transition to adulthood and assists the child in demonstrating progress in achieving related goals; (3) works with the child to plan for independent living skills and assists the child in demonstrating progress in achieving independent living goals; and (4) prepares the child for independence according to sections 260C.203, paragraph (d), and 260C.452, subdivision 4. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The responsible social services agency must ensure that an administrative review that meets the requirements of this section and section 260C.203 is completed at least six months after each of the court's annual reviews. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.452, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Administrative or court review of placements. (a) When the youth is 14 years of age or older, the court, in consultation with the youth, shall review the youth's independent living plan according to section 260C.203, paragraph (d). (b) The responsible social services agency shall file a copy of the notification of foster care benefits for a youth who is 18 years of age or older according to section 260C.451, subdivision 1, with the court. If the responsible social services agency does not file the notice by the time the youth is 17-1/2 years of age, the court shall require the responsible social services agency to file the notice. (c) When a youth is 18 years of age or older, the court shall ensure that the responsible social services agency assists the youth in obtaining the following documents before the youth leaves foster care: a Social Security card; an official or certified copy of the youth's birth certificate; a state identification card or driver's license, Tribal enrollment identification card, deleted text begin greendeleted text end new text begin permanent residentnew text end card, or school visa; health insurance information; the youth's school, medical, and dental records; a contact list of the youth's medical, dental, and mental health providers; and contact information for the youth's siblings, if the siblings are in foster care. (d) For a youth who will be discharged from foster care at 18 years of age or older because the youth is not eligible for extended foster care benefits or chooses to leave foster care, the responsible social services agency must develop a personalized transition plan as directed by the youth during the 180-day period immediately prior to the expected date of discharge. The transition plan must be as detailed as the youth elects and include specific options, including but not limited to: (1) affordable housing with necessary supports that does not include a homeless shelter; (2) health insurance, including eligibility for medical assistance as defined in section 256B.055, subdivision 17; (3) education, including application to the Education and Training Voucher Program; (4) local opportunities for mentors and continuing support services; (5) workforce supports and employment services; (6) a copy of the youth's consumer credit report as defined in section 13C.001 and assistance in interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies in the report, at no cost to the youth; (7) information on executing a health care directive under chapter 145C and on the importance of designating another individual to make health care decisions on behalf of the youth if the youth becomes unable to participate in decisions; (8) appropriate contact information through 21 years of age if the youth needs information or help dealing with a crisis situation; and (9) official documentation that the youth was previously in foster care. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.03, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Neglect. (a) "Neglect" means the commission or omission of any of the acts specified under clauses (1) to (8), other than by accidental means: (1) failure by a person responsible for a child's care to supply a child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, health, medical, or other care required for the child's physical or mental health when reasonably able to do so; (2) failure to protect a child from conditions or actions that seriously endanger the child's physical or mental health when reasonably able to do so, including a growth delay, which may be referred to as a failure to thrive, that has been diagnosed by a physician and is due to parental neglect; (3) failure to provide for necessary supervision or child care arrangements appropriate for a child after considering factors as the child's age, mental ability, physical condition, length of absence, or environment, when the child is unable to care for the child's own basic needs or safety, or the basic needs or safety of another child in their care; (4) failure to ensure that the child is educated as defined in sections 120A.22 and 260C.163, subdivision 11, which does not include a parent's refusal to provide the parent's child with sympathomimetic medications, consistent with section 125A.091, subdivision 5; (5) prenatal exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 2, used by the mother for a nonmedical purpose, as evidenced by withdrawal symptoms in the child at birth, results of a toxicology test performed on the mother at delivery or the child at birth, medical effects or developmental delays during the child's first year of life that medically indicate prenatal exposure to a controlled substance, or the presence of a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder; (6) medical neglect, as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 6, clause (5); (7) chronic and severe use of alcohol or a controlled substance by a person responsible for the child's care that adversely affects the child's basic needs and safety; or (8) emotional harm from a pattern of behavior that contributes to impaired emotional functioning of the child which may be demonstrated by a substantial and observable effect in the child's behavior, emotional response, or cognition that is not within the normal range for the child's age and stage of development, with due regard to the child's culture. (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean that a child is neglected solely because the child's parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care in good faith selects and depends upon spiritual means or prayer for treatment or care of disease or remedial care of the child in lieu of medical care. (c) This chapter does not impose upon persons not otherwise legally responsible for providing a child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, education, or medical care a duty to provide that care. new text begin (d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean that a child who has a mental, physical, or emotional condition is neglected solely because the child remains in an emergency department or hospital setting because services, including residential treatment, that are deemed necessary by the child's medical or mental health care professional or county case manager are not available to the child's parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child's care, and the child cannot be safely discharged to the child's family. new text end Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.065, is amended to read: 260E.065 TRAINING FOR REPORTERS. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Required training. new text end The local welfare agency must offer training to a person required to make a report under section 260E.055 or 260E.06. The training may be offered online or in person and must provide an explanation of the legal obligations of a reporter, consequences for failure to report, and instruction on how to detect and report suspected maltreatment deleted text begin or suspected abuse, as defined under section 260E.055, subdivision 1, paragraph (b)deleted text end . A local welfare agency may fulfill the requirement under this section by directing reporters to trainings offered by the commissioner. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Training content. new text end new text begin For a training under this section, at least half of the training time must be spent on how to identify signs of suspected maltreatment or abuse, as defined in section 260E.055, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). The training must cover the definition of each maltreatment type as defined in section 260E.03, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Expert input. new text end new text begin The commissioner must create trainings with input from professionals with specialized knowledge related to maltreatment, including but not limited to medical professionals, attorneys, mental health professionals, and social workers. new text end Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.09, is amended to read: 260E.09 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (a) An oral report shall be made immediately by telephone or otherwise. An oral report made by a person required under section 260E.06, subdivision 1, to report shall be followed within 72 hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, by a report in writing to the appropriate police department, the county sheriff, the agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report, or the local welfare agency. (b) Any report shall be of sufficient content to identify the child, any person believed to be responsible for the maltreatment of the child if the person is known, the nature and extent of the maltreatment, and the name and address of the reporter. The local welfare agency or agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report shall accept a report made under section 260E.06 notwithstanding refusal by a reporter to provide the reporter's name or address as long as the report is otherwise sufficient under this paragraph.new text begin The local welfare agency or agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report shall ask the reporter if the reporter is aware of the child or family heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10.new text end (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), upon implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub, an individual who has an account with the provider licensing and reporting hub and is required to report suspected maltreatment at a licensed program under section 260E.06, subdivision 1, may submit a written report in the hub in a manner prescribed by the commissioner and is not required to make an oral report. A report submitted through the provider licensing and reporting hub must be made immediately. Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.20, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General duties. (a) The local welfare agency shall offer services to prevent future maltreatment, safeguarding and enhancing the welfare of the maltreated child, and supporting and preserving family life whenever possible. (b) If the report alleges a violation of a criminal statute involving maltreatment or child endangerment under section 609.378, the local law enforcement agency and local welfare agency shall coordinate the planning and execution of their respective investigation and assessment efforts to avoid a duplication of fact-finding efforts and multiple interviews. Each agency shall prepare a separate report of the results of the agency's investigation or assessment. (c) In cases of alleged child maltreatment resulting in death, the local agency may rely on the fact-finding efforts of a law enforcement investigation to make a determination of whether or not maltreatment occurred. (d) When necessary, the local welfare agency shall seek authority to remove the child from the custody of a parent, guardian, or adult with whom the child is living. (e) In performing any of these duties, the local welfare agency shall maintain an appropriate record. (f) In conducting a family assessmentnew text begin , noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or investigation, the local welfare agency shall gather information on the existence of substance abuse and domestic violence. (g) If the family assessmentnew text begin , noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or investigation indicates there is a potential for abuse of alcohol or other drugs by the parent, guardian, or person responsible for the child's care, the local welfare agency must coordinate a comprehensive assessment pursuant to section 245G.05. (h) The agency may use either a family assessment or investigation to determine whether the child is safe when responding to a report resulting from birth match data under section 260E.03, subdivision 23, paragraph (c). If the child subject of birth match data is determined to be safe, the agency shall consult with the county attorney to determine the appropriateness of filing a petition alleging the child is in need of protection or services under section 260C.007, subdivision 6, clause (16), in order to deliver needed services. If the child is determined not to be safe, the agency and the county attorney shall take appropriate action as required under section 260C.503, subdivision 2. new text begin (i) When conducting any assessment or investigation, the agency shall ask the child, if age appropriate; parents; extended family; and reporter about the child's family heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and the child's race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10. new text end Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.20, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Collection of information. (a) The local welfare agency responsible for conducting a family assessmentnew text begin , noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or investigation shall collect available and relevant information to determine child safety, risk of subsequent maltreatment, and family strengths and needs and share not public information with an Indian's Tribal social services agency without violating any law of the state that may otherwise impose a duty of confidentiality on the local welfare agency in order to implement the Tribal state agreement. (b) The local welfare agency or the agency responsible for investigating the report shall collect available and relevant information to ascertain whether maltreatment occurred and whether protective services are needed. (c) Information collected includes, when relevant, information regarding the person reporting the alleged maltreatment, including the nature of the reporter's relationship to the child and to the alleged offender, and the basis of the reporter's knowledge for the report; the child allegedly being maltreated; the alleged offender; the child's caretaker; and other collateral sources having relevant information related to the alleged maltreatment. (d) Information relevant to the assessment or investigation must be requested, and may include: (1) the child's sex and age; prior reports of maltreatment, including any maltreatment reports that were screened out and not accepted for assessment or investigation; information relating to developmental functioning; credibility of the child's statement; and whether the information provided under this clause is consistent with other information collected during the course of the assessment or investigation; (2) new text begin except in a noncaregiver human trafficking assessment, new text end the alleged offender's age, a record check for prior reports of maltreatment, and criminal charges and convictions; (3) collateral source information regarding the alleged maltreatment and care of the child. Collateral information includes, when relevant: (i) a medical examination of the child; (ii) prior medical records relating to the alleged maltreatment or the care of the child maintained by any facility, clinic, or health care professional and an interview with the treating professionals; and (iii) interviews with the child's caretakers, including the child's parent, guardian, foster parent, child care provider, teachers, counselors, family members, relatives, and other persons who may have knowledge regarding the alleged maltreatment and the care of the child; and (4) information on the existence of domestic abuse and violence in the home of the child, and substance abuse. (e) Nothing in this subdivision precludes the local welfare agency, the local law enforcement agency, or the agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report from collecting other relevant information necessary to conduct the assessment or investigation. (f) Notwithstanding section 13.384 or 144.291 to 144.298, the local welfare agency has access to medical data and records for purposes of paragraph (d), clause (3). Sec. 38. new text begin [260E.215] REPORTING OF SCHOOL ATTENDANCE CONCERNS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reports required. new text end new text begin (a) A person mandated to report under this chapter must immediately report to the local welfare agency or designated partner if the person knows or has reason to believe that a child required to be enrolled in school under section 120A.22 has at least seven unexcused absences in the current school year and is at risk of educational neglect or truancy under section 260C.163, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (b) Any person may make a voluntary report if the person knows or has reason to believe that a child required to be enrolled in school under section 120A.22 has at least seven unexcused absences in the current school year and is at risk of educational neglect or truancy under section 260C.163, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (c) An oral report must be made immediately. An oral report made by a person required to report under paragraph (a) must be followed within 72 hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, by a report in writing to the local welfare agency. A report must sufficiently identify the child and the child's parent or guardian, the actual or estimated number of the child's unexcused absences in the current school year, the efforts made by school officials to resolve attendance concerns with the family, and the name and address of the reporter. A voluntary reporter under paragraph (b) may refuse to provide their name or address if the report is otherwise sufficient, and the local welfare agency must accept such a report. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local welfare agency. new text end new text begin (a) The local welfare agency or partner designated to provide child welfare services must provide a child welfare response for a report that alleges a child enrolled in school has seven or more unexcused absences. When providing a child welfare response under this paragraph, the local welfare agency or designated partner must offer services to the child and the child's family to address school attendance concerns or may partner with a county attorney's office, a community-based organization, or other community partner to provide the services. The services must be culturally and linguistically appropriate and tailored to the needs of the child and the child's family. This section is subject to the requirements of the Minnesota Indian Family Preservation Act under sections 260.751 to 260.835 and the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act under sections 260.61 to 260.693. new text end new text begin (b) If the unexcused absences continue and the family has not engaged with services under paragraph (a) after the local welfare agency or partner designated to provide child welfare services has made multiple varied attempts to engage the child's family, a report of educational neglect must be made regardless of the number of unexcused absences the child has accrued. The local welfare agency must determine the response path assignment pursuant to section 260E.17 and may proceed with the process outlined in section 260C.141. new text end Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.24, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Timing. The local welfare agency shall conclude the family assessmentnew text begin , the noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or the investigation within 45 days of the receipt of a report. The conclusion of the assessment or investigation may be extended to permit the completion of a criminal investigation or the receipt of expert information requested within 45 days of the receipt of the report. Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.24, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Determination after family assessment or a noncaregiver human trafficking assessment. After conducting a family assessment or a noncaregiver human trafficking assessment, the local welfare agency shall determine whether child protective services are needed to address the safety of the child and other family members and the risk of subsequent maltreatment. The local welfare agency must document the information collected under section 260E.20, subdivision 3, related to the completed family assessmentnew text begin or noncaregiver human trafficking assessmentnew text end in the child's or family's case notes. Sec. 41. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall change paragraphs to subdivisions, clauses to paragraphs, and items to clauses in Minnesota Statutes, sections 260C.203 and 260C.204. The revisor shall make any necessary grammatical changes or changes to sentence structure necessary to preserve the meaning of the text as a result of the changes. The revisor of statutes must correct any statutory cross-references consistent with the changes in this section. new text end ARTICLE 3 CHILD PROTECTION AND WELFARE FINANCE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Duties of the commissioner. (a) The commissioner may apply for and accept on behalf of the state any grants, bequests, gifts, or contributions for the purpose of carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the commissioner. Any money received under this paragraph is appropriated and dedicated for the purpose for which the money is granted. The commissioner must biennially report to the chairs and ranking minority members of relevant legislative committees and divisions by January 15 of each even-numbered year a list of all grants and gifts received under this subdivision. (b) Pursuant to law, the commissioner may apply for and receive money made available from federal sources for the purpose of carrying out the duties and responsibilities of the commissioner. (c) The commissioner may make contracts with and grants to Tribal Nations, public and private agencies, for-profit and nonprofit organizations, and individuals using appropriated money. (d) The commissioner must develop program objectives and performance measures for evaluating progress toward achieving the objectives. The commissioner must identify the objectives, performance measures, and current status of achieving the measures in a biennial report to the chairs and ranking minority members of relevant legislative committees and divisions. The report is due no later than January 15 each even-numbered year. The report must include, when possible, the following objectives: (1) centering and including the lived experiences of children and youth, including those with disabilities and mental illness and their families, in all aspects of the department's work; (2) increasing the effectiveness of the department's programs in addressing the needs of children and youth facing racial, economic, or geographic inequities; (3) increasing coordination and reducing inefficiencies among the department's programs and the funding sources that support the programs; (4) increasing the alignment and coordination of family access to child care and early learning programs and improving systems of support for early childhood and learning providers and services; (5) improving the connection between the department's programs and the kindergarten through grade 12 and higher education systems; and (6) minimizing and streamlining the effort required of youth and families to receive services to which the youth and families are entitled. (e) The commissioner shall administer and supervise the forms of public assistance and other activities or services that are vested in the commissioner. Administration and supervision of activities or services includes but is not limited to assuring timely and accurate distribution of benefits, completeness of service, and quality program management. In addition to administering and supervising activities vested by law in the department, the commissioner has the authority to: (1) require county agency participation in training and technical assistance programs to promote compliance with statutes, rules, federal laws, regulations, and policies governing the programs and activities administered by the commissioner; (2) monitor, on an ongoing basis, the performance of county agencies in the operation and administration of activities and programs; enforce compliance with statutes, rules, federal laws, regulations, and policies governing welfare services; and promote excellence of administration and program operation; (3) develop a quality control program or other monitoring program to review county performance and accuracy of benefit determinations; (4) require county agencies to make an adjustment to the public assistance benefits issued to any individual consistent with federal law and regulation and state law and rule and to issue or recover benefits as appropriate; (5) delay or deny payment of all or part of the state and federal share of benefits and administrative reimbursement according to the procedures set forth in section 142A.10; (6) make contracts with and grants to public and private agencies and organizations, both for-profit and nonprofit, and individuals, using appropriated funds; and (7) enter into contractual agreements with federally recognized Indian Tribes with a reservation in Minnesota to the extent necessary for the Tribe to operate a federally approved family assistance program or any other program under the supervision of the commissioner. The commissioner shall consult with the affected county or counties in the contractual agreement negotiations, if the county or counties wish to be included, in order to avoid the duplication of county and Tribal assistance program services. The commissioner may establish necessary accounts for the purposes of receiving and disbursing funds as necessary for the operation of the programs. The commissioner shall work in conjunction with the commissioner of human services to carry out the duties of this paragraph when necessary and feasible. (f) The commissioner shall inform county agencies, on a timely basis, of changes in statute, rule, federal law, regulation, and policy necessary to county agency administration of the programs and activities administered by the commissioner. (g) The commissioner shall administer and supervise child welfare activities, including promoting the enforcement of laws preventing child maltreatment and protecting children with a disability and children who are in need of protection or services, licensing and supervising child care and child-placing agencies, and supervising the care of children in foster care. The commissioner shall coordinate with the commissioner of human services on activities impacting children overseen by the Department of Human Services, such as disability services, behavioral health, and substance use disorder treatment. (h) The commissioner shall assist and cooperate with local, state, and federal departments, agencies, and institutions. (i) The commissioner shall establish and maintain any administrative units reasonably necessary for the performance of administrative functions common to all divisions of the department. (j) The commissioner shall act as designated guardian of children pursuant to chapter 260C. For children under the guardianship of the commissioner or a Tribe in Minnesota recognized by the Secretary of the Interior whose interests would be best served by adoptive placement, the commissioner may contract with a licensed child-placing agency or a Minnesota Tribal social services agency to provide adoption services. new text begin For children in out-of-home care whose interests would be best served by a transfer of permanent legal and physical custody to a relative under section 260C.515, subdivision 4, or equivalent in Tribal code, the commissioner may contract with a licensed child-placing agency or a Minnesota Tribal social services agency to provide permanency services. new text end A contract with a licensed child-placing agency must be designed to supplement existing county efforts and may not replace existing county programs or Tribal social services, unless the replacement is agreed to by the county board and the appropriate exclusive bargaining representative, Tribal governing body, or the commissioner has evidence that child placements of the county continue to be substantially below that of other counties. Funds encumbered and obligated under an agreement for a specific child shall remain available until the terms of the agreement are fulfilled or the agreement is terminated. (k) The commissioner has the authority to conduct and administer experimental projects to test methods and procedures of administering assistance and services to recipients or potential recipients of public benefits. To carry out the experimental projects, the commissioner may waive the enforcement of existing specific statutory program requirements, rules, and standards in one or more counties. The order establishing the waiver must provide alternative methods and procedures of administration and must not conflict with the basic purposes, coverage, or benefits provided by law. No project under this paragraph shall exceed four years. No order establishing an experimental project as authorized by this paragraph is effective until the following conditions have been met: (1) the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services has agreed, for the same project, to waive state plan requirements relative to statewide uniformity; and (2) a comprehensive plan, including estimated project costs, has been approved by the Legislative Advisory Commission and filed with the commissioner of administration. (l) The commissioner shall, according to federal requirements and in coordination with the commissioner of human services, establish procedures to be followed by local welfare boards in creating citizen advisory committees, including procedures for selection of committee members. (m) The commissioner shall allocate federal fiscal disallowances or sanctions that are based on quality control error rates for the aid to families with dependent children (AFDC) program formerly codified in sections 256.72 to 256.87 or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) in the following manner: (1) one-half of the total amount of the disallowance shall be borne by the county boards responsible for administering the programs. For AFDC, disallowances shall be shared by each county board in the same proportion as that county's expenditures to the total of all counties' expenditures for AFDC. For SNAP, sanctions shall be shared by each county board, with 50 percent of the sanction being distributed to each county in the same proportion as that county's administrative costs for SNAP benefits are to the total of all SNAP administrative costs for all counties, and 50 percent of the sanctions being distributed to each county in the same proportion as that county's value of SNAP benefits issued are to the total of all benefits issued for all counties. Each county shall pay its share of the disallowance to the state of Minnesota. When a county fails to pay the amount due under this paragraph, the commissioner may deduct the amount from reimbursement otherwise due the county, or the attorney general, upon the request of the commissioner, may institute civil action to recover the amount due; and (2) notwithstanding the provisions of clause (1), if the disallowance results from knowing noncompliance by one or more counties with a specific program instruction, and that knowing noncompliance is a matter of official county board record, the commissioner may require payment or recover from the county or counties, in the manner prescribed in clause (1), an amount equal to the portion of the total disallowance that resulted from the noncompliance and may distribute the balance of the disallowance according to clause (1). (n) The commissioner shall develop and implement special projects that maximize reimbursements and result in the recovery of money to the state. For the purpose of recovering state money, the commissioner may enter into contracts with third parties. Any recoveries that result from projects or contracts entered into under this paragraph shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a special account until the balance in the account reaches $1,000,000. When the balance in the account exceeds $1,000,000, the excess shall be transferred and credited to the general fund. All money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes of this paragraph. (o) The commissioner has the authority to establish and enforce the following county reporting requirements: (1) the commissioner shall establish fiscal and statistical reporting requirements necessary to account for the expenditure of funds allocated to counties for programs administered by the commissioner. When establishing financial and statistical reporting requirements, the commissioner shall evaluate all reports, in consultation with the counties, to determine if the reports can be simplified or the number of reports can be reduced; (2) the county board shall submit monthly or quarterly reports to the department as required by the commissioner. Monthly reports are due no later than 15 working days after the end of the month. Quarterly reports are due no later than 30 calendar days after the end of the quarter, unless the commissioner determines that the deadline must be shortened to 20 calendar days to avoid jeopardizing compliance with federal deadlines or risking a loss of federal funding. Only reports that are complete, legible, and in the required format shall be accepted by the commissioner; (3) if the required reports are not received by the deadlines established in clause (2), the commissioner may delay payments and withhold funds from the county board until the next reporting period. When the report is needed to account for the use of federal funds and the late report results in a reduction in federal funding, the commissioner shall withhold from the county boards with late reports an amount equal to the reduction in federal funding until full federal funding is received; (4) a county board that submits reports that are late, illegible, incomplete, or not in the required format for two out of three consecutive reporting periods is considered noncompliant. When a county board is found to be noncompliant, the commissioner shall notify the county board of the reason the county board is considered noncompliant and request that the county board develop a corrective action plan stating how the county board plans to correct the problem. The corrective action plan must be submitted to the commissioner within 45 days after the date the county board received notice of noncompliance; (5) the final deadline for fiscal reports or amendments to fiscal reports is one year after the date the report was originally due. If the commissioner does not receive a report by the final deadline, the county board forfeits the funding associated with the report for that reporting period and the county board must repay any funds associated with the report received for that reporting period; (6) the commissioner may not delay payments, withhold funds, or require repayment under clause (3) or (5) if the county demonstrates that the commissioner failed to provide appropriate forms, guidelines, and technical assistance to enable the county to comply with the requirements. If the county board disagrees with an action taken by the commissioner under clause (3) or (5), the county board may appeal the action according to sections 14.57 to 14.69; and (7) counties subject to withholding of funds under clause (3) or forfeiture or repayment of funds under clause (5) shall not reduce or withhold benefits or services to clients to cover costs incurred due to actions taken by the commissioner under clause (3) or (5). (p) The commissioner shall allocate federal fiscal disallowances or sanctions for audit exceptions when federal fiscal disallowances or sanctions are based on a statewide random sample in direct proportion to each county's claim for that period. (q) The commissioner is responsible for ensuring the detection, prevention, investigation, and resolution of fraudulent activities or behavior by applicants, recipients, and other participants in the programs administered by the department. The commissioner shall cooperate with the commissioner of education to enforce the requirements for program integrity and fraud prevention for investigation for child care assistance under chapter 142E. (r) The commissioner shall require county agencies to identify overpayments, establish claims, and utilize all available and cost-beneficial methodologies to collect and recover these overpayments in the programs administered by the department. (s) The commissioner shall develop recommended standards for child foster care homes that address the components of specialized therapeutic services to be provided by child foster care homes with those services. (t) The commissioner shall authorize the method of payment to or from the department as part of the programs administered by the department. This authorization includes the receipt or disbursement of funds held by the department in a fiduciary capacity as part of the programs administered by the department. (u) In coordination with the commissioner of human services, the commissioner shall create and provide county and Tribal agencies with blank applications, affidavits, and other forms as necessary for public assistance programs. (v) The commissioner shall cooperate with the federal government and its public welfare agencies in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid for temporary assistance for needy families and in conformity with Title I of Public Law 104-193, the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 and successor amendments, including making reports that contain information required by the federal Social Security Advisory Board and complying with any provisions the board may find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports. (w) On or before January 15 in each even-numbered year, the commissioner shall make a biennial report to the governor concerning the activities of the agency. (x) The commissioner shall enter into agreements with other departments of the state as necessary to meet all requirements of the federal government. (y) The commissioner may cooperate with other state agencies in establishing reciprocal agreements in instances where a child receiving Minnesota family investment program (MFIP) assistance or its out-of-state equivalent moves or contemplates moving into or out of the state, in order that the child may continue to receive MFIP or equivalent aid from the state moved from until the child has resided for one year in the state moved to. (z) The commissioner shall provide appropriate technical assistance to county agencies to develop methods to have county financial workers remind and encourage recipients of aid to families with dependent children, the Minnesota family investment program, the Minnesota family investment plan, family general assistance, or SNAP benefits whose assistance unit includes at least one child under the age of five to have each young child immunized against childhood diseases. The commissioner must examine the feasibility of utilizing the capacity of a statewide computer system to assist county agency financial workers in performing this function at appropriate intervals. (aa) The commissioner shall have the power and authority to accept on behalf of the state contributions and gifts for the use and benefit of children under the guardianship or custody of the commissioner. The commissioner may also receive and accept on behalf of such children money due and payable to them as old age and survivors insurance benefits, veterans benefits, pensions, or other such monetary benefits. Gifts, contributions, pensions, and benefits under this paragraph must be deposited in and disbursed from the social welfare fund provided for in sections 256.88 to 256.92. (bb) The specific enumeration of powers and duties in this section must not be construed to be a limitation upon the general powers granted to the commissioner. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.810, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Payments. The commissioner shall make grant payments to each approved program in four quarterly installments a year. The commissioner may certify an advance payment for the first quarter of the state fiscal year. Later payments must be made deleted text begin upon receipt by the state of a quarterly report on finances and program activitiesdeleted text end new text begin quarterlynew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.810, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Quarterly reportdeleted text end new text begin Reportingnew text end . The commissioner shall deleted text begin specifydeleted text end new text begin engage Tribal and urban Indian organizations to establishnew text end requirements for reportsnew text begin and reporting timelinesnew text end , including deleted text begin quarterlydeleted text end fiscal reportsnew text begin submitted to the commissioner at least annuallynew text end , according to section 142A.03, subdivision 2, paragraph (o). Each deleted text begin quarterdeleted text end new text begin reporting period as agreed upon by the commissioner and granteenew text end , an approved program receiving an Indian child welfare grant shall submit a report to the commissioner that includes: (1) a detailed accounting of grant money expended during the preceding deleted text begin quarterdeleted text end new text begin reporting periodnew text end , specifying expenditures by line item and year to date; and (2) a description of Indian child welfare activities conducted during the preceding deleted text begin quarterdeleted text end new text begin reporting periodnew text end , including the number of clients served and the type of services provided. deleted text begin The quarterlydeleted text end Reports must be submitted no later than 30 days after the deleted text begin end of each quarterdeleted text end new text begin agreed upon reporting timelinesnew text end of the state fiscal year. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.821, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Special focus grants. The amount available for grants established under section 260.785, subdivision 2, for child-placing agencies, Tribes, Indian organizations, and other social services organizations is one-fifth of the total annual appropriation for Indian child welfare grants. deleted text begin The maximum award under this subdivision is $100,000 a year for programs approved by the commissioner.deleted text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518.68, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Contents. new text begin (a) This subdivision expires January 1, 2027. For orders issued prior to January 1, 2027,new text end the required notices must be substantially as follows: IMPORTANT NOTICE 1. PAYMENTS TO PUBLIC AGENCY According to Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.50, payments ordered for maintenance and support must be paid to the public agency responsible for child support enforcement as long as the person entitled to receive the payments is receiving or has applied for public assistance or has applied for support and maintenance collection services. MAIL PAYMENTS TO: 2. DEPRIVING ANOTHER OF CUSTODIAL OR PARENTAL RIGHTS -- A FELONY A person may be charged with a felony who conceals a minor child or takes, obtains, retains, or fails to return a minor child from or to the child's parent (or person with custodial or visitation rights), according to Minnesota Statutes, section 609.26. A copy of that section is available from any district court clerk. 3. NONSUPPORT OF A SPOUSE OR CHILD -- CRIMINAL PENALTIES A person who fails to pay court-ordered child support or maintenance may be charged with a crime, which may include misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony charges, according to Minnesota Statutes, section 609.375. A copy of that section is available from any district court clerk. 4. RULES OF SUPPORT, MAINTENANCE, PARENTING TIME (a) Payment of support or spousal maintenance is to be as ordered, and the giving of gifts or making purchases of food, clothing, and the like will not fulfill the obligation. (b) Payment of support must be made as it becomes due, and failure to secure or denial of parenting time is NOT an excuse for nonpayment, but the aggrieved party must seek relief through a proper motion filed with the court. (c) Nonpayment of support is not grounds to deny parenting time. The party entitled to receive support may apply for support and collection services, file a contempt motion, or obtain a judgment as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 548.091. (d) The payment of support or spousal maintenance takes priority over payment of debts and other obligations. (e) A party who accepts additional obligations of support does so with the full knowledge of the party's prior obligation under this proceeding. (f) Child support or maintenance is based on annual income, and it is the responsibility of a person with seasonal employment to budget income so that payments are made throughout the year as ordered. (g) Reasonable parenting time guidelines are contained in Appendix B, which is available from the court administrator. (h) The nonpayment of support may be enforced through the denial of student grants; interception of state and federal tax refunds; suspension of driver's, recreational, and occupational licenses; referral to the department of revenue or private collection agencies; seizure of assets, including bank accounts and other assets held by financial institutions; reporting to credit bureaus; income withholding and contempt proceedings; and other enforcement methods allowed by law. (i) The public authority may suspend or resume collection of the amount allocated for child care expenses if the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.40, subdivision 4, are met. (j) The public authority may remove or resume a medical support offset if the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.41, subdivision 16, are met. 5. MODIFYING CHILD SUPPORT If either the obligor or obligee is laid off from employment or receives a pay reduction, child support may be modified, increased, or decreased. Any modification will only take effect when it is ordered by the court, and will only relate back to the time that a motion is filed. Either the obligor or obligee may file a motion to modify child support, and may request the public agency for help. UNTIL A MOTION IS FILED, THE CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATION WILL CONTINUE AT THE CURRENT LEVEL. THE COURT IS NOT PERMITTED TO REDUCE SUPPORT RETROACTIVELY. 6. PARENTAL RIGHTS FROM MINNESOTA STATUTES, SECTION 518.17, SUBDIVISION 3 Unless otherwise provided by the Court: (a) Each party has the right of access to, and to receive copies of, school, medical, dental, religious training, and other important records and information about the minor children. Each party has the right of access to information regarding health or dental insurance available to the minor children. Presentation of a copy of this order to the custodian of a record or other information about the minor children constitutes sufficient authorization for the release of the record or information to the requesting party. (b) Each party shall keep the other informed as to the name and address of the school of attendance of the minor children. Each party has the right to be informed by school officials about the children's welfare, educational progress and status, and to attend school and parent teacher conferences. The school is not required to hold a separate conference for each party. (c) In case of an accident or serious illness of a minor child, each party shall notify the other party of the accident or illness, and the name of the health care provider and the place of treatment. (d) Each party has the right of reasonable access and telephone contact with the minor children. 7. WAGE AND INCOME DEDUCTION OF SUPPORT AND MAINTENANCE Child support and/or spousal maintenance may be withheld from income, with or without notice to the person obligated to pay, when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.53 have been met. A copy of those sections is available from any district court clerk. 8. CHANGE OF ADDRESS OR RESIDENCE Unless otherwise ordered, each party shall notify the other party, the court, and the public authority responsible for collection, if applicable, of the following information within ten days of any change: the residential and mailing address, telephone number, driver's license number, Social Security number, and name, address, and telephone number of the employer. 9. COST OF LIVING INCREASE OF SUPPORT AND MAINTENANCE new text begin Prior to January 1, 2027, new text end basic support and/or spousal maintenance may be adjusted every two years based upon a change in the cost of living (using Department of Labor Consumer Price Index .........., unless otherwise specified in this order) when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.75, are met. Cost of living increases are compounded. A copy of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.75, and forms necessary to request or contest a cost of living increase are available from any district court clerk. 10. JUDGMENTS FOR UNPAID SUPPORT If a person fails to make a child support payment, the payment owed becomes a judgment against the person responsible to make the payment by operation of law on or after the date the payment is due, and the person entitled to receive the payment or the public agency may obtain entry and docketing of the judgment WITHOUT NOTICE to the person responsible to make the payment under Minnesota Statutes, section 548.091. 11. JUDGMENTS FOR UNPAID MAINTENANCE (a) A judgment for unpaid spousal maintenance may be entered when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 548.091, are met. A copy of that section is available from any district court clerk. (b) The public authority is not responsible for calculating interest on any judgment for unpaid spousal maintenance. When providing services in IV-D cases, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.26, subdivision 10, the public authority will only collect interest on spousal maintenance if spousal maintenance is reduced to a sum certain judgment. 12. ATTORNEY FEES AND COLLECTION COSTS FOR ENFORCEMENT OF CHILD SUPPORT A judgment for attorney fees and other collection costs incurred in enforcing a child support order will be entered against the person responsible to pay support when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.735, are met. A copy of Minnesota Statutes, sections 518.14 and 518A.735 and forms necessary to request or contest these attorney fees and collection costs are available from any district court clerk. 13. PARENTING TIME EXPEDITOR PROCESS On request of either party or on its own motion, the court may appoint a parenting time expeditor to resolve parenting time disputes under Minnesota Statutes, section 518.1751. A copy of that section and a description of the expeditor process is available from any district court clerk. 14. PARENTING TIME REMEDIES AND PENALTIES Remedies and penalties for the wrongful denial of parenting time are available under Minnesota Statutes, section 518.175, subdivision 6. These include compensatory parenting time; civil penalties; bond requirements; contempt; and reversal of custody. A copy of that subdivision and forms for requesting relief are available from any district court clerk. new text begin (b) For orders issued on or after January 1, 2027, the required notices must be substantially as follows: new text end new text begin IMPORTANT NOTICE new text end new text begin 1. PAYMENTS TO PUBLIC AGENCY new text end new text begin According to Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.50, payments ordered for maintenance and support must be paid to the public agency responsible for child support enforcement as long as the person entitled to receive the payments is receiving or has applied for public assistance or has applied for support and maintenance collection services. MAIL PAYMENTS TO: new text end new text begin 2. DEPRIVING ANOTHER OF CUSTODIAL OR PARENTAL RIGHTS -- A FELONY new text end new text begin A person may be charged with a felony who conceals a minor child or takes, obtains, retains, or fails to return a minor child from or to the child's parent (or person with custodial or visitation rights), according to Minnesota Statutes, section 609.26. A copy of that section is available from any district court clerk. new text end new text begin 3. NONSUPPORT OF A SPOUSE OR CHILD -- CRIMINAL PENALTIES new text end new text begin A person who fails to pay court-ordered child support or maintenance may be charged with a crime, which may include misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony charges, according to Minnesota Statutes, section 609.375. A copy of that section is available from any district court clerk. new text end new text begin 4. RULES OF SUPPORT, MAINTENANCE, PARENTING TIME new text end new text begin (a) Payment of support or spousal maintenance is to be as ordered, and the giving of gifts or making purchases of food, clothing, and the like will not fulfill the obligation. new text end new text begin (b) Payment of support must be made as it becomes due, and failure to secure or denial of parenting time is NOT an excuse for nonpayment, but the aggrieved party must seek relief through a proper motion filed with the court. new text end new text begin (c) Nonpayment of support is not grounds to deny parenting time. The party entitled to receive support may apply for support and collection services, file a contempt motion, or obtain a judgment as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 548.091. new text end new text begin (d) The payment of support or spousal maintenance takes priority over payment of debts and other obligations. new text end new text begin (e) A party who accepts additional obligations of support does so with the full knowledge of the party's prior obligation under this proceeding. new text end new text begin (f) Child support or maintenance is based on annual income, and it is the responsibility of a person with seasonal employment to budget income so that payments are made throughout the year as ordered. new text end new text begin (g) Reasonable parenting time guidelines are contained in Appendix B, which is available from the court administrator. new text end new text begin (h) The nonpayment of support may be enforced through the denial of student grants; interception of state and federal tax refunds; suspension of driver's, recreational, and occupational licenses; referral to the Department of Revenue or private collection agencies; seizure of assets, including bank accounts and other assets held by financial institutions; reporting to credit bureaus; income withholding and contempt proceedings; and other enforcement methods allowed by law. new text end new text begin (i) The public authority may suspend or resume collection of the amount allocated for child care expenses if the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.40, subdivision 4, are met. new text end new text begin (j) The public authority may remove or resume a medical support offset if the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.41, subdivision 16, are met. new text end new text begin 5. MODIFYING CHILD SUPPORT new text end new text begin If either the obligor or obligee is laid off from employment or receives a pay reduction, child support may be modified, increased, or decreased. Any modification will only take effect when it is ordered by the court, and will only relate back to the time that a motion is filed. Either the obligor or obligee may file a motion to modify child support, and may request the public agency for help. UNTIL A MOTION IS FILED, THE CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATION WILL CONTINUE AT THE CURRENT LEVEL. THE COURT IS NOT PERMITTED TO REDUCE SUPPORT RETROACTIVELY. new text end new text begin 6. PARENTAL RIGHTS FROM MINNESOTA STATUTES, SECTION 518.17, SUBDIVISION 3 new text end new text begin Unless otherwise provided by the court: new text end new text begin (a) Each party has the right of access to, and to receive copies of, school, medical, dental, religious training, and other important records and information about the minor children. Each party has the right of access to information regarding health or dental insurance available to the minor children. Presentation of a copy of this order to the custodian of a record or other information about the minor children constitutes sufficient authorization for the release of the record or information to the requesting party. new text end new text begin (b) Each party shall keep the other informed as to the name and address of the school of attendance of the minor children. Each party has the right to be informed by school officials about the children's welfare, educational progress, and status, and to attend school and parent-teacher conferences. The school is not required to hold a separate conference for each party. new text end new text begin (c) In case of an accident or serious illness of a minor child, each party shall notify the other party of the accident or illness, and the name of the health care provider and the place of treatment. new text end new text begin (d) Each party has the right of reasonable access and telephone contact with the minor children. new text end new text begin 7. WAGE AND INCOME DEDUCTION OF SUPPORT AND MAINTENANCE new text end new text begin Child support and/or spousal maintenance may be withheld from income, with or without notice to the person obligated to pay, when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.53, have been met. A copy of those sections is available from any district court clerk. new text end new text begin 8. CHANGE OF ADDRESS OR RESIDENCE new text end new text begin Unless otherwise ordered, each party shall notify the other party, the court, and the public authority responsible for collection, if applicable, of the following information within ten days of any change: the residential and mailing address, telephone number, driver's license number, Social Security number, and name, address, and telephone number of the employer. new text end new text begin 9. JUDGMENTS FOR UNPAID SUPPORT new text end new text begin If a person fails to make a child support payment, the payment owed becomes a judgment against the person responsible to make the payment by operation of law on or after the date the payment is due, and the person entitled to receive the payment or the public agency may obtain entry and docketing of the judgment WITHOUT NOTICE to the person responsible to make the payment under Minnesota Statutes, section 548.091. new text end new text begin 10. JUDGMENTS FOR UNPAID MAINTENANCE new text end new text begin (a) A judgment for unpaid spousal maintenance may be entered when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 548.091, are met. A copy of that section is available from any district court clerk. new text end new text begin (b) The public authority is not responsible for calculating interest on any judgment for unpaid spousal maintenance. When providing services in IV-D cases, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.26, subdivision 10, the public authority will only collect interest on spousal maintenance if spousal maintenance is reduced to a sum certain judgment. new text end new text begin 11. ATTORNEY FEES AND COLLECTION COSTS FOR ENFORCEMENT OF CHILD SUPPORT new text end new text begin A judgment for attorney fees and other collection costs incurred in enforcing a child support order will be entered against the person responsible to pay support when the conditions of Minnesota Statutes, section 518A.735, are met. A copy of Minnesota Statutes, sections 518.14 and 518A.735, and forms necessary to request or contest these attorney fees and collection costs are available from any district court clerk. new text end new text begin 12. PARENTING TIME EXPEDITOR PROCESS new text end new text begin On request of either party or on its own motion, the court may appoint a parenting time expeditor to resolve parenting time disputes under Minnesota Statutes, section 518.1751. A copy of that section and a description of the expeditor process is available from any district court clerk. new text end new text begin 13. PARENTING TIME REMEDIES AND PENALTIES new text end new text begin Remedies and penalties for the wrongful denial of parenting time are available under Minnesota Statutes, section 518.175, subdivision 6. These include compensatory parenting time, civil penalties, bond requirements, contempt, and reversal of custody. A copy of that subdivision and forms for requesting relief are available from any district court clerk. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518A.34, is amended to read: 518A.34 COMPUTATION OF CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATIONS. (a) To determine the presumptive child support obligation of a parent, the court shall follow the procedure set forth in this section. (b) To determine the obligor's basic support obligation, the court shall: (1) determine the gross income of each parent under section 518A.29; (2) calculate the parental income for determining child support (PICS) of each parent, by subtracting from the gross income the credit, if any, for each parent's nonjoint children under section 518A.33; (3) determine the percentage contribution of each parent to the combined PICS by dividing the combined PICS into each parent's PICS; (4) determine the combined basic support obligation by application of the guidelines in section 518A.35; (5) determine each parent's share of the combined basic support obligation by multiplying the percentage figure from clause (3) by the combined basic support obligation in clause (4); and (6) apply the parenting expense adjustment formula provided in section 518A.36 to determine the obligor's basic support obligation. (c) If the parents have split custody of joint children, child support must be calculated for each joint child as follows: (1) the court shall determine each parent's basic support obligation under paragraph (b) and include the amount of each parent's obligation in the court order. If the basic support calculation results in each parent owing support to the other, the court shall offset the higher basic support obligation with the lower basic support obligation to determine the amount to be paid by the parent with the higher obligation to the parent with the lower obligation. For the purpose of deleted text begin the cost-of-living adjustment required under section 518A.75, the adjustmentdeleted text end new text begin a future modification, the application of section 518A.39new text end must be based on each parent's basic support obligation prior to offset. For the purposes of this paragraph, "split custody" means that there are two or more joint children and each parent has at least one joint child more than 50 percent of the time; (2) if each parent pays all child care expenses for at least one joint child, the court shall calculate child care support for each joint child as provided in section 518A.40. The court shall determine each parent's child care support obligation and include the amount of each parent's obligation in the court order. If the child care support calculation results in each parent owing support to the other, the court shall offset the higher child care support obligation with the lower child care support obligation to determine the amount to be paid by the parent with the higher obligation to the parent with the lower obligation; and (3) if each parent pays all medical or dental insurance expenses for at least one joint child, medical support shall be calculated for each joint child as provided in section 518A.41. The court shall determine each parent's medical support obligation and include the amount of each parent's obligation in the court order. If the medical support calculation results in each parent owing support to the other, the court shall offset the higher medical support obligation with the lower medical support obligation to determine the amount to be paid by the parent with the higher obligation to the parent with the lower obligation. Unreimbursed and uninsured medical expenses are not included in the presumptive amount of support owed by a parent and are calculated and collected as provided in section 518A.41. (d) The court shall determine the child care support obligation for the obligor as provided in section 518A.40. (e) The court shall determine the medical support obligation for each parent as provided in section 518A.41. Unreimbursed and uninsured medical expenses are not included in the presumptive amount of support owed by a parent and are calculated and collected as described in section 518A.41. (f) The court shall determine each parent's total child support obligation by adding together each parent's basic support, child care support, and health care coverage obligations as provided in this section. (g) If Social Security benefits or veterans' benefits are received by one parent as a representative payee for a joint child based on the other parent's eligibility, the court shall subtract the amount of benefits from the other parent's net child support obligation, if any. Any benefit received by the obligee for the benefit of the joint child based upon the obligor's disability or past earnings in any given month in excess of the child support obligation must not be treated as an arrearage payment or a future payment. (h) The final child support order shall separately designate the amount owed for basic support, child care support, and medical support. If applicable, the court shall use the self-support adjustment and minimum support adjustment under section 518A.42 to determine the obligor's child support obligation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518A.46, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Administrative redirection of support. (a) The public authority must provide written notice of redirection to the obligee, the obligor, and the caregiver. The notice must be mailed to the obligor, obligee, and caregiver at the obligee's, the obligor's, and the caregiver's respective last known address. The notice must state the name of the child or children for whom support will be redirected, to whom the support will be redirected, the date the support will be redirected, and the amount of the support that will be redirected. The notice must also inform the parties of the right to contest the redirection of support according to paragraph (c). (b) If fewer than all of the children for whom the support is ordered reside with the caregiver, the public authority must redirect the proportional share of the support for the number of children residing with the caregiver. (c) The obligee or obligor may contest the redirection of support on the limited grounds that: (1) the child or children do not reside or no longer reside with the caregiver; (2) under an out-of-home placement plan under section 260C.212, subdivision 1, that includes a plan for reunification, all or part of the support is needed to maintain the obligee's home; or (3) the redirection of support is not in the best interests of the child. (d) To contest the redirection, the obligee or obligor must make a written request for a hearing to the public authority within 30 calendar days of the date of the written notice of redirection. The hearing must be held at the earliest practicable time, but no later than 30 calendar days from the date the public authority receives the written request for a hearing. If the public authority receives a timely written request for a hearing, the public authority must schedule a hearing and serve the obligee and the obligor with a notice of hearing at least 14 days before the date of the hearing. The notice must be served personally or by mail at the obligee's and the obligor's respective last known address. The public authority must file with the court the notice of hearing along with the notice of redirection at least five days before the scheduled hearing. The court administrator must schedule these hearings to be heard in the expedited process before a child support magistrate, but may schedule these hearings in district court if the availability of a child support magistrate does not permit a hearing to occur within the time frames of this subdivision. (e) If neither the obligee nor the obligor contests the redirection of support under this subdivision, support must be redirected to the caregiver effective the first day of the month following the expiration of the time period to contest under paragraph (d). If the obligee or the obligor contests the redirection of support under paragraph (d), the public authority must not redirect support to the caregiver pending the outcome of the hearing. (f) The redirection of the basic support, medical support, and child care support terminates and the public authority must direct support to the obligee if the public authority determines that: (1) the caregiver for the child no longer receives public assistance for the child; (2) the voluntary placement agreement expires; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) the court order placing the child is no longer in effectdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) the redirection of support is not in the best interests of the child as determined under section 260B.331, subdivision 1, or 260C.331, subdivision 1. new text end (g) The public authority must notify the obligee, obligor, and caregiver of a termination of the redirection of support by mailing a written notice to each of them at their last known address. The termination is effective the first day of the month that occurs at least 14 calendar days after the date the notice is mailed. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518A.75, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirement. (a) An order establishing, modifying, or enforcing maintenance or child support shall provide for a biennial adjustment in the amount to be paid based on a change in the cost of living. An order that provides for a cost-of-living adjustment shall specify the cost-of-living index to be applied and the date on which the cost-of-living adjustment shall become effective. The court may use the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, Minneapolis-St. Paul (CPI-U), the Consumer Price Index for wage earners and clerical, Minneapolis-St. Paul (CPI-W), or another cost-of-living index published by the Department of Labor which it specifically finds is more appropriate. Cost-of-living increases under this section shall be compounded. The court may also increase the amount by more than the cost-of-living adjustment by agreement of the parties or by making further findings. (b) The adjustment becomes effective on the first of May of the year in which it is made, for cases in which payment is made to the public authority. For cases in which payment is not made to the public authority, application for an adjustment may be made in any month but no application for an adjustment may be made sooner than two years after the date of the dissolution decree. A court may waive the requirement of the cost-of-living clause if it expressly finds that the obligor's occupation or income, or both, does not provide for cost-of-living adjustment or that the order for maintenance or child support has a provision such as a step increase that has the effect of a cost-of-living clause. The court may waive a cost-of-living adjustment in a maintenance order if the parties so agree in writing. The commissioner of children, youth, and families may promulgate rules for child support adjustments under this section in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of chapter 14. Notice of this statute must comply with section 518.68, subdivision 2. new text begin (c) No adjustment under this section shall be made after January 1, 2027, for any maintenance or child support order established before, on, or after January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin SOCIAL SERVICES INFORMATION SYSTEM MODERNIZATION.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families must improve and modernize the child welfare social services information system. Elements the commissioner must address as part of the system modernization include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) capabilities that support case intake, screening, assessments, and investigations; new text end new text begin (2) the capacity for local social services agencies to track various financial information, including benefits received by counties on behalf of children in the child welfare system, and fees received by counties from parents with children in out-of-home placements; new text end new text begin (3) access for the ombudspersons for families, the ombudsperson for American Indian families, and the foster youth ombudsperson, on a case-by-case basis, to nonprivileged information necessary for the discharge of the ombudsperson's duties, including specific child protection case information, while protecting Tribal data sovereignty; new text end new text begin (4) comprehensive statewide data reports, including data on law enforcement involvement in the child protection system; new text end new text begin (5) demographic information about children in the child welfare system, including race, cultural and ethnic identity, disability status, and economic status; new text end new text begin (6) bidirectional data exchanges, as required by federal Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System regulations; and new text end new text begin (7) data quality measures, as required by federal Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System regulations. new text end new text begin (b) By March 15, 2026, the commissioner of children, youth, and families must provide the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child welfare and state and local government with a plan and estimated timeline for modernization of the social services information system in compliance with state law and federal Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System requirements. new text end new text begin (c) By August 15, 2026, and by each January 15 and July 15 thereafter, the commissioner must provide an update on the social services information system modernization efforts and progress toward federal compliance required under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child welfare and state and local government. This paragraph expires upon the commissioner's report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child welfare and state and local government that the modernization required under this section has been substantially completed. new text end ARTICLE 4 EARLY CARE AND LEARNING POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.42, is amended to read: 142A.42 DIAPER DISTRIBUTION deleted text begin GRANTdeleted text end PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Establishment; purpose. The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish a diaper distribution program to award deleted text begin competitive grants to eligible applicantsdeleted text end new text begin a sole-source grant to the Diaper Bank of Minnesotanew text end to provide diapers to underresourced families statewide. Subd. 2. Eligibility. To be eligible for a grant under this section, deleted text begin an applicantdeleted text end new text begin the Diaper Bank of Minnesotanew text end must demonstrate its capacity to distribute diapers statewide by having: (1) a network of well-established partners for diaper distribution; (2) the infrastructure needed to efficiently manage diaper procurement and distribution statewide; (3) relationships with national organizations that support and enhance the work of addressing diaper need; (4) the ability to engage in building community awareness of diaper need and advocate for diaper need at local, state, and federal levels; (5) a commitment to and demonstration of working with organizations across ideological and political spectrums; (6) the ability to address diaper need for children from birth through early childhood; and (7) a commitment to working within an equity framework by ensuring access to organizations that provide culturally specific services or are located in communities with high concentrations of poverty. Subd. 3. Application. deleted text begin Applicantsdeleted text end new text begin The Diaper Bank of Minnesotanew text end must apply to the commissioner in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. Applications must be filed at the times and for the periods determined by the commissioner. Subd. 4. Eligible uses of grant money. deleted text begin An eligible applicant that receives grant money under this section shalldeleted text end new text begin The Diaper Bank of Minnesota mustnew text end use the money new text begin awarded under this section new text end to purchase diapers and wipes and may use up to ten percent of the money for administrative costs. Subd. 5. Enforcement. (a) deleted text begin An eligible applicant that receives grant money under this sectiondeleted text end new text begin The Diaper Bank of Minnesotanew text end must: (1) retain records documenting expenditure of the grant money; (2) report to the commissioner on the use of the grant money; and (3) comply with any additional requirements imposed by the commissioner. (b) The commissioner may require that a report submitted under this subdivision include an independent audit. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.21, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Payments. (a) The commissioner shall provide payments under this section to all eligible programs on a noncompetitive basis. The payment amounts shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent staff who regularly care for children in the program, including any employees, sole proprietors, or independent contractors. (b) For purposes of this section, "one full-time equivalent" is defined as an individual caring for children 32 hours per week. An individual can count as more or less than one full-time equivalent staff, but as no more than two full-time equivalent staff. (c) The commissioner must establish an amount to award per full-time equivalent individual who regularly cares for children in the program. deleted text begin (d) Payments must be increased by ten percent for programs receiving child care assistance payments under section 142E.08 or 142E.17 or early learning scholarships under section 142D.25, or for programs located in a child care access equity area. The commissioner must develop a method for establishing child care access equity areas. For purposes of this section, "child care access equity area" means an area with low access to child care, high poverty rates, high unemployment rates, low homeownership rates, and low median household incomes. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The commissioner shall establish the form, frequency, and manner for making payments under this section. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Data. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given in this paragraph. new text end new text begin (1) "Great start compensation program support payment data" means data for a specified time period showing that a great start compensation payment under this section was made and the amount of great start compensation payments made to a child care and early learning program. new text end new text begin (2) "Data on children and families" means data about the enrollment and attendance as described in subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2). new text end new text begin (b) Great start compensation program support payment data are public except that: new text end new text begin (1) any data on children and families collected by the great start compensation support payment program that may identify a specific family or child or, as determined by the commissioner, are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12; new text end new text begin (2) great start compensation payment data about operating expenses and personnel expenses are private or nonpublic data; and new text end new text begin (3) great start compensation payment data about legal nonlicensed child care providers as described in subdivision 8 are private or nonpublic data. new text end ARTICLE 5 EARLY CARE AND LEARNING FINANCE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.18, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. License suspension, revocation, or fine. (a) The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license, or impose a fine if: (1) a license holder fails to comply fully with applicable laws or rules including but not limited to the requirements of this chapter and chapter 245C; (2) a license holder, a controlling individual, or an individual living in the household where the licensed services are provided or is otherwise subject to a background study has been disqualified and the disqualification was not set aside and no variance has been granted; (3) a license holder knowingly withholds relevant information from or gives false or misleading information to the commissioner in connection with an application for a license, in connection with the background study status of an individual, during an investigation, or regarding compliance with applicable laws or rules; (4) a license holder is excluded from any program administered by the commissioner under section 142A.12; (5) revocation is required under section 142B.10, subdivision 14, paragraph (d); (6) for a family foster setting, a license holder, or an individual living in the household where the licensed services are provided or who is otherwise subject to a background study, has nondisqualifying background study information, as described in section 245C.05, subdivision 4, that reflects on the license holder's ability to safely provide care to foster children; or (7) suspension is necessary under subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clause (2). A license holder who has had a license issued under this chapter suspended, revoked, or has been ordered to pay a fine must be given notice of the action by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the notice must be mailed to the address shown on the application or the last known address of the license holder. The notice must state in plain language the reasons the license was suspended or revoked, or a fine was ordered. (b) If the license was suspended or revoked, the notice must inform the license holder of the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14 and Minnesota Rules, parts 1400.8505 to 1400.8612. The license holder may appeal an order suspending or revoking a license. The appeal of an order suspending or revoking a license must be made in writing by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the appeal must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder receives notice that the license has been suspended or revoked. If a request is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder received the order. If the order is issued through the provider hub, the appeal must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order through the hub. Except as provided in subdivision 3, paragraph (c), if a license holder submits a timely appeal of an order suspending or revoking a license, the license holder may continue to operate the program as provided under section 142B.10, subdivision 14, paragraphs (i) and (j), until the commissioner issues a final order on the suspension or revocation. (c)(1) If the license holder was ordered to pay a fine, the notice must inform the license holder of the responsibility for payment of fines and the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14 and Minnesota Rules, parts 1400.8505 to 1400.8612. The appeal of an order to pay a fine must be made in writing by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the appeal must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder receives notice that the fine has been ordered. If a request is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder received the order. If the order is issued through the provider hub, the appeal must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order through the hub. (2) The license holder shall pay the fines assessed on or before the payment date specified. If the license holder fails to fully comply with the order, the commissioner may issue a second fine or suspend the license until the license holder complies. If the license holder receives state funds, the state, county, or municipal agencies or departments responsible for administering the funds shall withhold payments and recover any payments made while the license is suspended for failure to pay a fine. A timely appeal shall stay payment of the fine until the commissioner issues a final order. (3) A license holder shall promptly notify the commissioner of children, youth, and families, in writing, when a violation specified in the order to forfeit a fine is corrected. If upon reinspection the commissioner determines that a violation has not been corrected as indicated by the order to forfeit a fine, the commissioner may issue a second fine. The commissioner shall notify the license holder by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub that a second fine has been assessed. The license holder may appeal the second fine as provided under this subdivision. (4) Fines shall be assessed as follows: (i) the license holder shall forfeit $1,000 for each determination of maltreatment of a child under chapter 260E or the maltreatment of a vulnerable adult under section 626.557 for which the license holder is determined responsible for the maltreatment under section 260E.30, subdivision 4, paragraphs (a) and (b), or 626.557, subdivision 9c, paragraph (c); (ii) if the commissioner determines that a determination of maltreatment for which the license holder is responsible is the result of maltreatment that meets the definition of serious maltreatment as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 18, the license holder shall forfeit $5,000; (iii) for a program that operates out of the license holder's home and a program licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9502.0300 to 9502.0445, the fine assessed against the license holder shall not exceed $1,000 for each determination of maltreatment; (iv) the license holder shall forfeit $200 for each occurrence of a violation of law or rule governing matters of health, safety, or supervision, including but not limited to the provision of adequate staff-to-child or adult ratiosdeleted text begin , and failure to comply with background study requirements under chapter 245Cdeleted text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (v) the license holder shall forfeit $500 for each occurrence of failure to comply with background study requirements under chapter 245C; and new text end deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (vi)new text end the license holder shall forfeit $100 for each occurrence of a violation of law or rule other than those subject to a $5,000, $1,000, deleted text begin ordeleted text end $200new text begin , or $500new text end fine in items (i) to deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end . (5) When a fine has been assessed, the license holder may not avoid payment by closing, selling, or otherwise transferring the licensed program to a third party. In such an event, the license holder will be personally liable for payment. In the case of a corporation, each controlling individual is personally and jointly liable for payment. (d) Except for background study violations involving the failure to comply with an order to immediately remove an individual or an order to provide continuous, direct supervision, the commissioner shall not issue a fine under paragraph (c) relating to a background study violation to a license holder who self-corrects a background study violation before the commissioner discovers the violation. A license holder who has previously exercised the provisions of this paragraph to avoid a fine for a background study violation may not avoid a fine for a subsequent background study violation unless at least 365 days have passed since the license holder self-corrected the earlier background study violation. Sec. 2. new text begin [142B.68] VIDEO SECURITY CAMERAS IN CHILD CARE CENTERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Facility" means the indoor and outdoor space in which child care is provided that is owned, leased, or operated by a licensed child care center and does not include any outdoor space that is not located on the same property as the licensed child care center. new text end new text begin (c) "Video security camera" means a closed circuit video camera or other closed circuit device that captures or records video. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirements for video security cameras. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, a licensed child care center must have video security cameras in public and shared areas of its facility as provided under this subdivision and comply with the requirements of this section if the center is required to post a maltreatment investigation memorandum under section 142B.16, subdivision 5, or 142B.18, subdivision 6. A center must comply with the requirements under this section within six months of when the maltreatment investigation memorandum is posted and must maintain compliance for the length of time the memorandum is required to be posted. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed child care center must have at least one video security camera in each room designated for infants or toddlers. The camera must be positioned to provide maximum visibility of the room. If one camera is not sufficient to view at least 80 percent of the square footage of the room, the center must place an additional camera or cameras in the room to achieve maximum visibility of the room. new text end new text begin (c) A licensed child care center must have a sufficient number of video security cameras to provide visibility of all the facility's outdoor recreational equipment used by infants or toddlers and at least 80 percent of the square footage of the facility's fenced-in outdoor space used by infants or toddlers. new text end new text begin (d) The video security cameras must: new text end new text begin (1) be turned on and recording at all times the licensed child care center is in operation; new text end new text begin (2) record and display the accurate date and time; new text end new text begin (3) have a display resolution of 720p or higher; and new text end new text begin (4) have a frames per second rate of 15 or higher. new text end new text begin (e) A licensed child care center is exempt from having cameras that meet the requirements under paragraph (d), clauses (2), (3), and (4), if the center has cameras as required in paragraphs (b) and (c) prior to July 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Retention and disposal of recordings; access to recordings. new text end new text begin (a) A licensed child care center must retain video security camera recordings for 60 calendar days after the date of the recording. Except as provided under paragraphs (b), (c), and (d), a licensed child care center must dispose of video security camera recordings after 60 calendar days. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed child care center that receives notice from a law enforcement official of a suspected crime committed against a child at the center may not dispose of any video security camera recordings until the law enforcement investigation of the suspected crime is complete. new text end new text begin (c) A licensed child care center must retain video security camera recordings related to an incident that the center must report to the commissioner under Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0130, for six months from the date of the incident. new text end new text begin (d) A licensed child care center may retain video security camera recordings to use for training center employees. Any recordings used for training purposes must redact, as defined under section 13.825, subdivision 1, identifying information on children shown or heard in the recording, unless a parent or legal guardian has provided written consent providing that the center may use unredacted recordings of the parent's or guardian's child. new text end new text begin (e) A licensed child care center must adhere to additional requirements issued by the commissioner regarding retention and disposal of video security camera recordings. new text end new text begin (f) A licensed child care center must establish appropriate security safeguards for video security camera recordings, including procedures for ensuring that the recordings are only accessible to persons whose work assignment reasonably requires access to the recordings, and are only accessed by those persons for purposes described in the procedure. All queries and responses, and all actions in which the recordings are accessed, shared, or disseminated, must be recorded in a data audit trail. Data contained in the audit trail are subject to the same requirements as the underlying recording under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Dissemination of recordings. new text end new text begin (a) A licensed child care center may not sell, share, transmit, or disseminate a video security camera recording to any person except as authorized by this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) A child care center must disseminate a video security camera recording pursuant to a valid court order, search warrant, or subpoena in a civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding, including an investigation by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) A licensed child care center must establish a process by which a parent or legal guardian may review, but not obtain a copy of, a video security camera recording if the parent or guardian provides documentation from a physician of a child's physical injury. new text end new text begin (d) An employee of a licensed child care center who is the subject of proposed disciplinary action by the center based upon evidence obtained by a video security camera must be given access to that evidence for purposes of defending against the proposed action. An employee who obtains a recording or a copy of the recording must treat the recording or copy confidentially and must not further disseminate it to any other person except as required under law. The employee must not keep the recording or copy or a portion of the recording or copy after it is no longer needed for purposes of defending against a proposed action. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the requirement to have closed circuit video security cameras under this section and subdivision 4, paragraph (a), a licensed child care center that, as of July 1, 2025, provided remote viewing of video footage for parents and legal guardians may continue to do so in the same manner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Hold harmless. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may not issue a fix-it ticket, correction order, or order of conditional license against a child care center license holder for a licensing violation that does not imminently endanger the health or safety of the children served by the center, if the only source of evidence for the violation is video security camera recordings reviewed as part of an investigation under subdivision 4, paragraph (b). This paragraph expires upon implementation of the child care weighted risk system under section 142B.171. The commissioner shall notify the revisor of statutes when the system has been implemented. new text end new text begin (b) Upon implementation of the child care weighted risk system under section 142B.171, the commissioner may not take a licensing action against a child care center license holder for a violation that counts as 6.5 or below for a child care center in the weighted risk system, if the only source of evidence for the violation is video security camera recordings reviewed as part of an investigation under subdivision 4, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Written policy required. new text end new text begin A licensed child care center must have a written policy on the center's use of video security cameras that includes the following: new text end new text begin (1) the days and times the video security cameras in the facility are in use; new text end new text begin (2) the locations of all areas monitored by video security cameras in the facility; new text end new text begin (3) the center's retention and disposal policies and procedures for the video security camera recordings; new text end new text begin (4) the center's policies governing access to the video security camera recordings; and new text end new text begin (5) the center's security safeguards and procedures regarding employee access to the recordings. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Notices. new text end new text begin (a) A licensed child care center must notify all parents and legal guardians who apply to enroll or enroll a child in the center about the use of video security cameras in the facility. At the time of a child's enrollment, the center must provide parents and legal guardians with the video security camera policy required under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed child care center must post a sign at each facility entrance accessible to visitors that states: "Video security cameras are present to record persons and activities." new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Data practices. new text end new text begin Video footage collected or maintained by the commissioner under this section is classified as welfare data under section 13.46. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Annual audit. new text end new text begin If a licensed child care center is required to have video security cameras under this section, the commissioner must conduct, as part of the annual licensing inspection required under this chapter, an audit to determine whether the center's use of video security cameras complies with the requirements of this section, including but not limited to all requirements in subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.21, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. new text begin Account; new text end carryforward authority. deleted text begin Money appropriated under this section is available until expended. deleted text end new text begin (a) An account is established in the special revenue fund known as the great start compensation support payment program account. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated under this section must be transferred to the great start compensation support payment program account in the special revenue fund. new text end new text begin (c) Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner for the purposes of this section. Any returned funds are available to be regranted. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.23, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligible uses of money. Grantees must use money received under this section, either directly or through grants to eligible child care providers, for one or more of the following purposes: (1) the purchase of computers or mobile devices for use in business management; (2) access to the Internet through the provision of necessary hardware such as routers or modems or by covering the costs of monthly fees for Internet access; (3) covering the costs of subscription to child care management software; (4) covering the costs of training in the use of technology for business management purposes; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin (5) providing grants for up to $4,000 to licensed child care centers to help cover the costs of video security cameras and related training; or new text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end other services as determined by the commissioner. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.31, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Program components. (a) The nonprofit organization must use the grant for: (1) tuition scholarships deleted text begin up to $10,000 per yeardeleted text end new text begin in amounts per year consistent with the national TEACH early childhood program requirementsnew text end for courses leading to the nationally recognized child development associate credential or college-level courses leading to an associate's degree or bachelor's degree in early childhood development and school-age care; and (2) education incentives of a minimum of $250 to participants in the tuition scholarship program if they complete a year of working in the early care and education field. (b) Applicants for the scholarship must be employed by a licensed new text begin or certified new text end early childhood or child care program and working directly with children, a licensed family child care provider, employed by a public prekindergarten program, new text begin employed by a Head Start program, new text end or an employee in a school-age program exempt from licensing under section 142B.05, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (8). Lower wage earners must be given priority in awarding the tuition scholarships. Scholarship recipients must contribute at least ten percent of the total scholarship and must be sponsored by their employers, who must also contribute at least five percent of the total scholarship. Scholarship recipients who deleted text begin are self-employeddeleted text end new text begin work in licensed family child care under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502,new text end must contribute deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin at least tennew text end percent of the total scholarshipnew text begin and are not required to receive employer sponsorship or employer matchnew text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.03, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Redeterminations. (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 3400.0180, item A, the county shall conduct a redetermination according to paragraphs (b) and (c). (b) The county shall use the redetermination form developed by the commissioner. The county must verify the factors listed in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), as part of the redetermination. (c) An applicant's eligibility must be redetermined no more frequently than every 12 months. The following criteria apply: (1) a family meets the eligibility redetermination requirements if a complete redetermination form and all required verifications are received within 30 days after the date the form was due; (2) if the 30th day after the date the form was due falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the 30-day time period is extended to include the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday. Assistance shall be payable retroactively from the redetermination due date; (3) for a family where at least one parent is younger than 21 years of age, does not have a high school degree or commissioner of education-selected high school equivalency certification, and is a student in a school district or another similar program that provides or arranges for child care, parenting, social services, career and employment supports, and academic support to achieve high school graduation, the redetermination of eligibility may be deferred beyond 12 months, to the end of the student's school year; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) starting May 25, 2026, if a new eligible child is added to the family and has care authorized, the redetermination of eligibility must be extended 12 months from the eligible child's arrival date; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end a family and the family's providers must be notified that the family's redetermination is due at least 45 days before the end of the family's 12-month eligibility period. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General authorization requirements. (a) When authorizing the amount of child care, the county agency must consider the amount of time the parent reports on the application or redetermination form that the child attends preschool, a Head Start program, or school while the parent is participating in an authorized activity. (b) Care must be authorized and scheduled with a provider based on the applicant's or participant's verified activity schedule when: (1) the family requests care from more than one provider per child; (2) the family requests care from a legal nonlicensed provider; or (3) an applicant or participant is employed by any child care center that is licensed by the Department of Children, Youth, and Families or has been identified as a high-risk Medicaid-enrolled provider. new text begin This paragraph expires March 2, 2026. new text end (c) If the family remains eligible at redetermination, a new authorization with fewer hours, the same hours, or increased hours may be determined. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.11, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Maintain steady child care authorizations. (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, chapter 3400, the amount of child care authorized under section 142E.12 for employment, education, or an MFIP employment plan shall continue at the same number of hours or more hours until redetermination, including: (1) when the other parent moves in and is employed or has an education plan under section 142E.12, subdivision 3, or has an MFIP employment plan; or (2) when the participant's work hours are reduced or a participant temporarily stops working or attending an approved education program. Temporary changes include, but are not limited to, a medical leave, seasonal employment fluctuations, or a school break between semesters. (b) The county may increase the amount of child care authorized at any time if the participant verifies the need for increased hours for authorized activities. (c) The county may reduce the amount of child care authorized if a parent requests a reduction or because of a change in: (1) the child's school schedule; (2) the custody schedule; or (3) the provider's availability. (d) The amount of child care authorized for a family subject to subdivision 1, paragraph (b), must change when the participant's activity schedule changes. Paragraph (a) does not apply to a family subject to subdivision 1, paragraph (b).new text begin This paragraph expires March 2, 2026.new text end (e) When a child reaches 13 years of age or a child with a disability reaches 15 years of age, the amount of child care authorized shall continue at the same number of hours or more hours until redetermination. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Extended eligibility and redetermination. (a) If the family received three months of extended eligibility and redetermination is not due, to continue receiving child care assistance the participant must be employed or have an education plan that meets the requirements of section 142E.12, subdivision 3, or have an MFIP employment plan. new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 3400.0110, new text end if child care assistance continues, the amount of child care authorized shall continue at the same number or more hours until redetermination, unless a condition in section 142E.11, subdivision 2, paragraph (c), applies. deleted text begin A family subject to section 142E.11, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), shall have child care authorized based on a verified activity schedule.deleted text end (b) If the family's redetermination occurs before the end of the three-month extended eligibility period to continue receiving child care assistance, the participant must verify that the participant meets eligibility and activity requirements for child care assistance under this chapter. If child care assistance continues, the amount of child care authorized is based on section 142E.12. deleted text begin A family subject to section 142E.11, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), shall have child care authorized based on a verified activity schedule.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective May 25, 2026. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.15, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Fee schedule. All changes to parent fees must be implemented on the first Monday of the service period following the effective date of the change. PARENT FEE SCHEDULE. The parent fee schedule is as follows, except as noted in subdivision 2: Income Range (as a percent of the state median income, except at the start of the first tier) Co-payment (as a percentage of adjusted gross income) deleted text begin 0-74.99%deleted text end new text begin 0-99.99%new text end of federal poverty guidelines $0/biweekly deleted text begin 75.00-99.99% of federal poverty guidelines deleted text end deleted text begin $2/biweekly deleted text end 100.00% of federal poverty guidelines-deleted text begin 27.72%deleted text end new text begin 27.99%new text end deleted text begin 2.61% deleted text end new text begin 2.6% new text end deleted text begin 27.73-29.04% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.61% deleted text end deleted text begin 29.05-30.36% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.61% deleted text end deleted text begin 30.37-31.68% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.61% deleted text end deleted text begin 31.69-33.00% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.91% deleted text end deleted text begin 33.01-34.32% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.91% deleted text end deleted text begin 34.33-35.65% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.91% deleted text end deleted text begin 35.66-36.96% deleted text end deleted text begin 2.91% deleted text end deleted text begin 36.97-38.29% deleted text end deleted text begin 3.21% deleted text end deleted text begin 38.30-39.61% deleted text end deleted text begin 3.21% deleted text end deleted text begin 39.62-40.93% deleted text end deleted text begin 3.21% deleted text end deleted text begin 40.94-42.25% deleted text end deleted text begin 3.84% deleted text end deleted text begin 42.26-43.57% deleted text end deleted text begin 3.84% deleted text end deleted text begin 43.58-44.89% deleted text end deleted text begin 4.46% deleted text end deleted text begin 44.90-46.21% deleted text end deleted text begin 4.76% deleted text end deleted text begin 46.22-47.53% deleted text end deleted text begin 5.05% deleted text end deleted text begin 47.54-48.85% deleted text end deleted text begin 5.65% deleted text end deleted text begin 48.86-50.17% deleted text end deleted text begin 5.95% deleted text end deleted text begin 50.18-51.49% deleted text end deleted text begin 6.24% deleted text end deleted text begin 51.50-52.81% deleted text end deleted text begin 6.84% deleted text end deleted text begin 52.82-54.13% deleted text end deleted text begin 7.58% deleted text end deleted text begin 54.14-55.45% deleted text end deleted text begin 8.33% deleted text end deleted text begin 55.46-56.77% deleted text end deleted text begin 9.20% deleted text end deleted text begin 56.78-58.09% deleted text end deleted text begin 10.07% deleted text end deleted text begin 58.10-59.41% deleted text end deleted text begin 10.94% deleted text end deleted text begin 59.42-60.73% deleted text end deleted text begin 11.55% deleted text end deleted text begin 60.74-62.06% deleted text end deleted text begin 12.16% deleted text end deleted text begin 62.07-63.38% deleted text end deleted text begin 12.77% deleted text end deleted text begin 63.39-64.70% deleted text end deleted text begin 13.38% deleted text end deleted text begin 64.71-67.00% deleted text end deleted text begin 14.00% deleted text end new text begin 28.00-30.99% new text end new text begin 2.6% new text end new text begin 31.00-33.99% new text end new text begin 2.6% new text end new text begin 34.00-36.99% new text end new text begin 2.9% new text end new text begin 37.00-39.99% new text end new text begin 3.2% new text end new text begin 40.00-42.99% new text end new text begin 3.8% new text end new text begin 43.00-45.99% new text end new text begin 4.4% new text end new text begin 46.00-48.99% new text end new text begin 5.0% new text end new text begin 49.00-51.99% new text end new text begin 5.6% new text end new text begin 52.00-54.99% new text end new text begin 6.2% new text end new text begin 55.00-57.99% new text end new text begin 6.8% new text end new text begin 58.00-60.99% new text end new text begin 6.9% new text end new text begin 61.00-63.99% new text end new text begin 6.9% new text end new text begin 64.00-67.00% new text end new text begin 6.9% new text end Greater than 67.00% ineligible A family's biweekly co-payment fee is the fixed percentage established for the income range multiplied by the deleted text begin highestdeleted text end new text begin lowestnew text end possible income within that income range. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 13, 2025. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.16, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Training required. (a) Prior to initial authorization as required in subdivision 1, a legal nonlicensed family child care provider must complete first aid and CPR training and provide the verification of first aid and CPR training to the commissioner. The training documentation must have valid effective dates as of the date the registration request is submitted to the commissioner. The training must have been provided by an individual approved to provide first aid and CPR instruction and have included CPR techniques for infants and children. (b) Upon each reauthorization after the authorization period when the initial first aid and CPR training requirements are met, a legal nonlicensed family child care provider must provide verification of at least eight hours of additional training listed in the Minnesota Center for Professional Development Registry. new text begin (c) Every 12 months, a legal nonlicensed family child care provider who is unrelated to the child they care for must complete two hours of training in caring for children approved by the commissioner. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end This subdivision only applies to legal nonlicensed family child care providers. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.16, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Record-keeping requirement. (a) As a condition of payment, all providers receiving child care assistance payments must: (1) keep accurate and legible daily attendance records at the site where services are delivered for children receiving child care assistance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) make those records available immediately to the county or the commissioner upon request. Any records not provided to a county or the commissioner at the date and time of the request are deemed inadmissible if offered as evidence by the provider in any proceeding to contest an overpayment or disqualification of the providerdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) submit data on child enrollment and attendance in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end (b) As a condition of payment, attendance records must be completed daily and include the date, the first and last name of each child in attendance, and the times when each child is dropped off and picked up. To the extent possible, the times that the child was dropped off to and picked up from the child care provider must be entered by the person dropping off or picking up the child. The daily attendance records must be retained at the site where services are delivered for six years after the date of service. (c) When the county or the commissioner knows or has reason to believe that a current or former provider has not complied with the record-keeping requirement in this subdivision: (1) the commissioner may: (i) deny or revoke a provider's authorization to receive child care assistance payments under section 142E.17, subdivision 9, paragraph (d); (ii) pursue an administrative disqualification under sections 142E.51, subdivision 5, and 256.98; or (iii) take an action against the provider under deleted text begin sections 142E.50 to 142E.58deleted text end new text begin section 142E.51new text end ; or (2) a county or the commissioner may establish an attendance record overpayment under paragraph (d). (d) To calculate an attendance record overpayment under this subdivision, the commissioner or county agency shall subtract the maximum daily rate from the total amount paid to a provider for each day that a child's attendance record is missing, unavailable, incomplete, inaccurate, or otherwise inadequate. (e) The commissioner shall develop criteria for a county to determine an attendance record overpayment under this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 22, 2026. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.17, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Provider payments. (a) A provider shall bill only for services documented according to section 142E.16, subdivision 7. The provider shall bill for services provided within ten days of the end of the service period.new text begin A provider must sign each bill and declare, under penalty of perjury as provided in section 609.48, that the information in the bill is true and correct.new text end Payments under the child care fund shall be made within 21 days of receiving a complete bill from the provider. Counties or the state may establish policies that make payments on a more frequent basis. (b) If a provider has received an authorization of care and been issued a billing form for an eligible family, the bill must be submitted within 60 days of the last date of service on the bill. A bill submitted more than 60 days after the last date of service must be paid if the county determines that the provider has shown good cause why the bill was not submitted within 60 days. Good cause must be defined in the county's child care fund plan under section 142E.09, subdivision 3, and the definition of good cause must include county error. Any bill submitted more than a year after the last date of service on the bill must not be paid. (c) If a provider provided care for a time period without receiving an authorization of care and a billing form for an eligible family, payment of child care assistance may only be made retroactively for a maximum of three months from the date the provider is issued an authorization of care and a billing form. For a family at application, if a provider provided child care during a time period without receiving an authorization of care and a billing form, a county may only make child care assistance payments to the provider retroactively from the date that child care began, or from the date that the family's eligibility began under section 142E.10, subdivision 7, or from the date that the family meets authorization requirements, not to exceed six months from the date that the provider is issued an authorization of care and a billing form, whichever is later. (d) The commissioner may refuse to issue a child care authorization to a certified, licensed, or legal nonlicensed provider; revoke an existing child care authorization to a certified, licensed, or legal nonlicensed provider; stop payment issued to a certified, licensed, or legal nonlicensed provider; or refuse to pay a bill submitted by a certified, licensed, or legal nonlicensed provider if: (1) the provider admits to intentionally giving the county materially false information on the provider's billing forms; (2) the commissioner finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the provider intentionally gave the county materially false information on the provider's billing forms, or provided false attendance records to a county or the commissioner; (3) the provider is in violation of child care assistance program rules, until the agency determines those violations have been corrected; (4) the provider is operating after: (i) an order of suspension of the provider's license issued by the commissioner; (ii) an order of revocation of the provider's license issued by the commissioner; or (iii) an order of decertification issued to the provider; (5) the provider submits false attendance reports or refuses to provide documentation of the child's attendance upon request; (6) the provider gives false child care price information; or (7) the provider fails to report decreases in a child's attendance as required under section 142E.16, subdivision 9. (e) For purposes of paragraph (d), clauses (3), (5), (6), and (7), the commissioner may withhold the provider's authorization or payment for a period of time not to exceed three months beyond the time the condition has been corrected. (f) A county's payment policies must be included in the county's child care plan under section 142E.09, subdivision 3. If payments are made by the state, in addition to being in compliance with this subdivision, the payments must be made in compliance with section 16A.124. (g) If the commissioner suspends or refuses payment to a provider under paragraph (d), clause (1) or (2), or sections 142E.50 to 142E.58 and the provider has: (1) a disqualification for wrongfully obtaining assistance under section 256.98, subdivision 8, paragraph (c); (2) an administrative disqualification under section 142E.51, subdivision 5; or (3) a termination under section 142E.51, subdivision 4, paragraph (c), clause (4), or 142E.55; then the provider forfeits the payment to the commissioner or the responsible county agency, regardless of the amount assessed in an overpayment, charged in a criminal complaint, or ordered as criminal restitution. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.0962, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. The commissioner of deleted text begin human servicesdeleted text end new text begin children, youth, and familiesnew text end must establish a quality parenting initiative grant program to implement quality parenting initiative principles and practices to support children and families experiencing foster care placements. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin ELIMINATING SCHEDULE REPORTER DESIGNATION.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 142E.04, subdivisions 6, 7, and 8, the commissioner of children, youth, and families must allocate additional basic sliding fee child care money for calendar years 2026 and 2027 to counties and Tribes to account for eliminating the schedule reporter designation in the child care assistance program. In allocating the additional money, the commissioner shall consider: new text end new text begin (1) the number of children who are in schedule reporter families; and new text end new text begin (2) the average basic sliding fee cost of care in the county or Tribe. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin CHILDREN AND FAMILIES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS MODERNIZATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Direction to commissioner. new text end new text begin To the extent there is funding available for these purposes in the state systems account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.04, subdivision 2, the commissioner of children, youth, and families must establish and implement the information technology systems described under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Family common application tool. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish and implement an application tool that allows families to apply for available early care and education support programs. The application tool must: new text end new text begin (1) provide integrated support in multiple languages, including real-time translation capabilities; new text end new text begin (2) include an eligibility screener; new text end new text begin (3) include capability for automatic pre-population of known family information and use open authorization to validate identity; new text end new text begin (4) enable application completion and submission across multiple programs and services; new text end new text begin (5) integrate selection tool for early care and education programs; new text end new text begin (6) reach families through various ways, including employers, employee organizations, and medical assistance managed care organizations; and new text end new text begin (7) operate using the software as a service model that ensures frequent maintenance and user experience updates. new text end new text begin (b) Funding under this section for the application tool may only be used for early care and education support programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Payments system. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and implement a centralized, integrated payment system for early care and education funding streams that: new text end new text begin (1) integrates seamlessly with the existing provider licensing and reporting hub; new text end new text begin (2) implements real-time payment processing and cash management capabilities, including instant fund transfers and automated reconciliation; new text end new text begin (3) incorporates robust security measures, including fraud detection and prevention; new text end new text begin (4) enables automated compliance with state and federal reporting requirements; new text end new text begin (5) provides a user-friendly interface with mobile accessibility for child care providers to manage invoices and payments; new text end new text begin (6) ensures interoperability with other relevant state systems and databases; and new text end new text begin (7) implements data quality monitoring and reporting tools to support decision making. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting requirements. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide quarterly implementation updates to the chairs and minority leads of the committees with jurisdiction over programs for children and families. The quarterly updates must describe the department's progress toward establishing and implementing the information technology systems under this section. The quarterly updates must continue until either the systems are fully implemented or the department no longer has sufficient funding for the purposes identified in this section. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 245.0962, as Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.47. The revisor shall also make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 18. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 142D.12, subdivision 3, as Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.121. The revisor shall also make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end ARTICLE 6 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.10, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Grant of license; license extension. (a) If the commissioner determines that the program complies with all applicable rules and laws, the commissioner shall issue a license consistent with this section or, if applicable, a temporary change of ownership license under section 142B.11. At minimum, the license shall state: (1) the name of the license holder; (2) the address of the program; (3) the effective date and expiration date of the license; (4) the type of license; (5) the maximum number and ages of persons that may receive services from the program; and (6) any special conditions of licensure. (b) The commissioner may issue a license for a period not to exceed two years if: (1) the commissioner is unable to conduct the observation required by subdivision 11, paragraph (a), clause (3), because the program is not yet operational; (2) certain records and documents are not available because persons are not yet receiving services from the program; and (3) the applicant complies with applicable laws and rules in all other respects. (c) A decision by the commissioner to issue a license does not guarantee that any person or persons will be placed or cared for in the licensed program. (d) Except as provided in paragraphs (i) and (j), the commissioner shall not issue a license if the applicant, license holder, or an affiliated controlling individual has: (1) been disqualified and the disqualification was not set aside and no variance has been granted; (2) been denied a license under this chapter or chapter 245A within the past two years; (3) had a license issued under this chapter or chapter 245A revoked within the past five years; or (4) failed to submit the information required of an applicant under subdivision 1, paragraph (f), (g), or (h), after being requested by the commissioner. When a license issued under this chapter or chapter 245A is revoked, the license holder and each affiliated controlling individual with a revoked license may not hold any license under chapter 142B for five years following the revocation, and other licenses held by the applicant or license holder or licenses affiliated with each controlling individual shall also be revoked. (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d), the commissioner may elect not to revoke a license affiliated with a license holder or controlling individual that had a license revoked within the past five years if the commissioner determines that (1) the license holder or controlling individual is operating the program in substantial compliance with applicable laws and rules and (2) the program's continued operation is in the best interests of the community being served. (f) Notwithstanding paragraph (d), the commissioner may issue a new license in response to an application that is affiliated with an applicant, license holder, or controlling individual that had an application denied within the past two years or a license revoked within the past five years if the commissioner determines that (1) the applicant or controlling individual has operated one or more programs in substantial compliance with applicable laws and rules and (2) the program's operation would be in the best interests of the community to be served. (g) In determining whether a program's operation would be in the best interests of the community to be served, the commissioner shall consider factors such as the number of persons served, the availability of alternative services available in the surrounding community, the management structure of the program, whether the program provides culturally specific services, and other relevant factors. (h) The commissioner shall not issue or reissue a license under this chapter if an individual living in the household where the services will be provided as specified under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, has been disqualified and the disqualification has not been set aside and no variance has been granted. (i) Pursuant to section 142B.18, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), when a license issued under this chapter has been suspended or revoked and the suspension or revocation is under appeal, the program may continue to operate pending a final order from the commissioner. If the license under suspension or revocation will expire before a final order is issued, a temporary provisional license may be issued provided any applicable license fee is paid before the temporary provisional license is issued. (j) Notwithstanding paragraph (i), when a revocation is based on the disqualification of a controlling individual or license holder, and the controlling individual or license holder is ordered under section 245C.17 to be immediately removed from direct contact with persons receiving services or is ordered to be under continuous, direct supervision when providing direct contact services, the program may continue to operate only if the program complies with the order and submits documentation demonstrating compliance with the order. If the disqualified individual fails to submit a timely request for reconsideration, or if the disqualification is not set aside and no variance is granted, the order to immediately remove the individual from direct contact or to be under continuous, direct supervision remains in effect pending the outcome of a hearing and final order from the commissioner. (k) For purposes of reimbursement for meals only, under the Child and Adult Care Food Program, Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, subtitle B, chapter II, subchapter A, part 226, relocation within the same county by a licensed family day care provider, shall be considered an extension of the license for a period of no more than 30 calendar days or until the new license is issued, whichever occurs first, provided the county agency has determined the family day care provider meets licensure requirements at the new location. (l) Unless otherwise specified by statute, all licenses issued under this chapter expire at 12:01 a.m. on the day after the expiration date stated on the license. A license holder must deleted text begin apply for and be granteddeleted text end new text begin comply with the requirements in section 142B.12 and be reissuednew text end a new license to operate the program or the program must not be operated after the expiration date.new text begin Child foster care license holders must apply for and be granted a new license to operate the program or the program must not be operated after the expiration date. Upon implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub, licenses may be issued each calendar year.new text end (m) The commissioner shall not issue or reissue a license under this chapter if it has been determined that a tribal licensing authority has established jurisdiction to license the program or service. (n) The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall coordinate and share data with the commissioner of human services to enforce this section. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.10, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Variances. (a) The commissioner may grant variances to rules that do not affect the health or safety of persons in a licensed program if the following conditions are met: (1) the variance must be requested by an applicant or license holder on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner; (2) the request for a variance must include the reasons that the applicant or license holder cannot comply with a requirement as stated in the rule and the alternative equivalent measures that the applicant or license holder will follow to comply with the intent of the rule; and (3) the request must state the period of time for which the variance is requested. The commissioner may grant a permanent variance when conditions under which the variance is requested do not affect the health or safety of persons being served by the licensed program, nor compromise the qualifications of staff to provide services. The permanent variance shall expire as soon as the conditions that warranted the variance are modified in any way. Any applicant or license holder must inform the commissioner of any changes or modifications that have occurred in the conditions that warranted the permanent variance. Failure to advise the commissioner shall result in revocation of the permanent variance and may be cause for other sanctions under sections 142B.17 and 142B.18. The commissioner's decision to grant or deny a variance request is final and not subject to appeal under the provisions of chapter 14. (b) The commissioner shall consider variances for child care center staff qualification requirements under Minnesota Rules, parts 9503.0032 and 9503.0033, that do not affect the health and safety of children served by the center. A variance request must be submitted to the commissioner in accordance with paragraph (a) and must include a plan for the staff person to gain additional experience, education, or training, as requested by the commissioner. When reviewing a variance request under this section, the commissioner shall consider the staff person's level of professional development, including but not limited to steps completed on the Minnesota career lattice. new text begin (c) The commissioner must grant a variance for a child care program's licensed capacity limit if: new text end new text begin (1) the program's indoor space is within 100 square feet of what would be required for maximum enrollment in the program based on the program's number and qualifications of staff; new text end new text begin (2) the fire marshall approves the variance; and new text end new text begin (3) the applicant or license holder submits the variance request to the commissioner in accordance with paragraph (a). new text end new text begin For purposes of this paragraph, a "child care program" means a child care center or family or group family child care provider licensed under this chapter and Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Counties shall use a uniform application form developed by the commissioner for variance requests by family child care license holders. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Reconsideration of correction orders. (a) If the applicant or license holder believes that the contents of the commissioner's correction order are in error, the applicant or license holder may ask the Department of Children, Youth, and Families to reconsider the parts of the correction order that are alleged to be in error. The request for reconsideration must be made in writing and must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within 20 calendar days after receipt of the correction order new text begin under this paragraph, or receipt of the interpretive guidance under paragraph (d), new text end by the applicant or license holder or submitted in the provider licensing and reporting hub within 20 calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order new text begin under this paragraph, or provided the interpretive guidance under paragraph (d), new text end through the hub, and: (1) specify the parts of the correction order that are alleged to be in error; (2) explain why they are in error; and (3) include documentation to support the allegation of error. new text begin (b) new text end Upon implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub, the provider must use the hub to request reconsiderationnew text begin under this paragraph, or to request interpretive guidance under paragraph (d)new text end . A request for reconsideration does not stay any provisions or requirements of the correction order. The commissioner's disposition of a request for reconsideration is final and not subject to appeal under chapter 14. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end This paragraph applies only to licensed family child care providers. A licensed family child care provider who requests reconsideration of a correction order under paragraph (a) may also request, on a form and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, that the commissioner expedite the review if: (1) the provider is challenging a violation and provides a description of how complying with the corrective action for that violation would require the substantial expenditure of funds or a significant change to their program; and (2) describes what actions the provider will take in lieu of the corrective action ordered to ensure the health and safety of children in care pending the commissioner's review of the correction order. new text begin (d) Prior to a request for reconsideration under paragraph (a), if the applicant or license holder believes that the applicable rule or statute is ambiguous or the commissioner's interpretation of the applicable rule or statute is in error, the applicant or license holder may ask the Department of Children, Youth, and Families to provide interpretive guidance on the applicable rule or statute underlying the correction order. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must not publicly post the correction order for licensed child care centers or licensed family child care providers on the department's website until: new text end new text begin (1) after the 20-calendar-day period for requesting reconsideration; or new text end new text begin (2) if the applicant or license holder requested reconsideration, after the commissioner's disposition of a request for reconsideration is provided to the applicant or license holder. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, except that paragraph (e) is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of children, youth, and families must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.16, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Requirement to post conditional license. For licensed family child care providers and child care centers, upon receipt of any order of conditional license issued by the commissioner under this section, and notwithstanding a pending request for reconsideration of the order of conditional license by the license holder, the license holder shall post the order of conditional license in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for two years. When the order of conditional license is accompanied by a maltreatment investigation memorandum prepared under section 626.557 or chapter 260E, the investigation memoranda must be posted with the order of conditional licensenew text begin , and the license holder must post both in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for ten yearsnew text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.171, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Documented technical assistance. (a) In lieu of a correction order under section 142B.16, the commissioner shall provide documented technical assistance to a family child care or child care center license holder if the commissioner finds that: (1) the license holder has failed to comply with a requirement in this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503, that the commissioner determines to be low risk as determined by the child care weighted risk system; (2) the noncompliance does not imminently endanger the health, safety, or rights of the persons served by the program; and (3) the license holder did not receive documented technical assistance or a correction order for the same violation at the license holder's most recent annual licensing inspection. (b) Documented technical assistance must include communication from the commissioner to the license holder that: (1) states the conditions that constitute a violation of a law or rule; (2) references the specific law or rule violated; and (3) explains remedies for correcting the violation. deleted text begin (c) The commissioner shall not publicly publish documented technical assistance on the department's website. deleted text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.18, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Requirement to post licensing order or fine. For licensed family child care providers and child care centers, upon receipt of any order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation issued by the commissioner under this section, and notwithstanding a pending appeal of the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation by the license holder, the license holder shall post the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for two years. When the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocation is accompanied by a maltreatment investigation memorandum prepared under section 626.557 or chapter 260E, the investigation memoranda must be posted with the order of license suspension, temporary immediate suspension, fine, or revocationnew text begin , and the license holder must post both in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for ten yearsnew text end . Sec. 7. new text begin [142B.181] POSTING LICENSING ACTIONS ON DEPARTMENT WEBSITE. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must post a summary document for each licensing action issued to a licensed child care center and family child care provider on the Licensing Information Lookup public website maintained by the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. The commissioner must not post any communication, including letters, from the commissioner to the center or provider. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must remove a summary document from the Licensing Information Lookup public website within ten days of the length of time that the document is required to be posted under Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 98.33. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of children, youth, and families must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.30, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Delegation of authority to agencies. (a) County agencies and private agencies that have been designated or licensed by the commissioner to perform licensing functions and activities under section 142B.10; to recommend denial of applicants under section 142B.15; to issue correction orders, to issue variances, and to recommend a conditional license under section 142B.16; or to recommend suspending or revoking a license or issuing a fine under section 142B.18, shall comply with rules and directives of the commissioner governing those functions and with this section. The following variances are excluded from the delegation of variance authority and may be issued only by the commissioner: (1) dual licensure of family child care and family child foster care; (2) child foster care maximum age requirement; (3) variances regarding disqualified individuals; (4) variances to requirements relating to chemical use problems of a license holder or a household member of a license holder; and (5) variances to section 142B.74 for a time-limited period. If the commissioner grants a variance under this clause, the license holder must provide notice of the variance to all parents and guardians of the children in care. (b) The commissioners of human services and children, youth, and families must both approve a variance for dual licensure of family child foster care and family adult foster care or family adult foster care and family child care. Variances under this paragraph are excluded from the delegation of variance authority and may be issued only by both commissioners. (c) Except as provided in section 142B.41, subdivision 4, paragraph (e), a county agency must not grant a license holder a variance to exceed the maximum allowable family child care license capacity of 14 children. (d) A county agency that has been designated by the commissioner to issue family child care variances must: (1) publish the county agency's policies and criteria for issuing variances on the county's public website and update the policies as necessary; and (2) annually distribute the county agency's policies and criteria for issuing variances to all family child care license holders in the county. (e) Before the implementation of NETStudy 2.0, county agencies must report information about disqualification reconsiderations under sections 245C.25 and 245C.27, subdivision 2, paragraphs (a) and (b), and variances granted under paragraph (a), clause (5), to the commissioner at least monthly in a format prescribed by the commissioner. (f) For family child care programs, the commissioner shall require a county agency to conduct one unannounced licensing review at least annually. (g) A new text begin child foster care new text end license issued under this section may be issued for up to two yearsnew text begin until implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub. Upon implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub, licenses may be issued each calendar yearnew text end . (h) A county agency shall report to the commissioner, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, the following information for a licensed family child care program: (1) the results of each licensing review completed, including the date of the review, and any licensing correction order issued; (2) any death, serious injury, or determination of substantiated maltreatment; and (3) any fires that require the service of a fire department within 48 hours of the fire. The information under this clause must also be reported to the state fire marshal within two business days of receiving notice from a licensed family child care provider. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Staff distribution. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0040, subpart 2, item B, an aide may substitute for a teacher during morning arrival and afternoon departure times in a licensed child care center if the total arrival and departure time does not exceed 25 percent of the center's daily hours of operation. In order for an aide to be used in this capacity, an aide must: new text end new text begin (1) be at least 18 years of age; new text end new text begin (2) have worked in the licensed child care center for a minimum of 30 days; and new text end new text begin (3) have completed all preservice and first-90-days training required for licensing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.51, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Child passenger restraint systems; training requirement. (a) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services under chapter 245A or the Department of Children, Youth, and Families under this chapter and Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, that serve a child or children under deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end years of age must document training that fulfills the requirements in this subdivision. (b) Before a license holder, staff person, or caregiver transports a child or children under age deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end in a motor vehicle, the person transporting the child must satisfactorily complete training on the proper use and installation of child restraint systems in motor vehicles. Training completed under this section may be used to meet initial or ongoing training under Minnesota Rules, part 2960.3070, subparts 1 and 2. (c) Training required under this section must be completed at orientation or initial training and repeated at least once every five years. At a minimum, the training must address the proper use of child restraint systems based on the child's size, weight, and age, and the proper installation of a car seat or booster seat in the motor vehicle used by the license holder to transport the child or children. (d) Training under paragraph (c) must be provided by individuals who are certified and approved by the Office of Traffic Safety within the Department of Public Safety. License holders may obtain a list of certified and approved trainers through the Department of Public Safety website or by contacting the agency. deleted text begin (e) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), for an emergency relative placement under section 142B.06, the commissioner may grant a variance to the training required by this subdivision for a relative who completes a child seat safety check up. The child seat safety check up trainer must be approved by the Department of Public Safety, Office of Traffic Safety, and must provide one-on-one instruction on placing a child of a specific age in the exact child passenger restraint in the motor vehicle in which the child will be transported. Once granted a variance, and if all other licensing requirements are met, the relative applicant may receive a license and may transport a relative foster child younger than eight years of age. A child seat safety check up must be completed each time a child requires a different size car seat according to car seat and vehicle manufacturer guidelines. A relative license holder must complete training that meets the other requirements of this subdivision prior to placement of another foster child younger than eight years of age in the home or prior to the renewal of the child foster care license. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, except paragraph (e), which is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.65, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Child passenger restraint systems; training requirement. (a) Before a license holder transports a child or children under age deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end in a motor vehicle, the person placing the child or children in a passenger restraint must satisfactorily complete training on the proper use and installation of child restraint systems in motor vehicles. (b) Training required under this subdivision must be repeated at least once every five years. At a minimum, the training must address the proper use of child restraint systems based on the child's size, weight, and age, and the proper installation of a car seat or booster seat in the motor vehicle used by the license holder to transport the child or children. (c) Training required under this subdivision must be provided by individuals who are certified and approved by the Department of Public Safety, Office of Traffic Safety. License holders may obtain a list of certified and approved trainers through the Department of Public Safety website or by contacting the agency. (d) Child care providers that only transport school-age children as defined in section 142B.01, subdivision 25, in child care buses as defined in section 169.448, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), are exempt from this subdivision. (e) Training completed under this subdivision may be used to meet in-service training requirements under subdivision 9. Training completed within the previous five years is transferable upon a staff person's change in employment to another child care center. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.65, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. In-service training. (a) A license holder must ensure that the center director, staff persons, substitutes, and unsupervised volunteers complete in-service training each calendar year. (b) The center director and staff persons who work more than 20 hours per week must complete 24 hours of in-service training each calendar year. Staff persons who work 20 hours or less per week must complete 12 hours of in-service training each calendar year. Substitutes and unsupervised volunteers must complete new text begin at least two hours of training each year, and the training must include new text end the requirements of paragraphs (d) to (g) deleted text begin and do not otherwise have a minimum number of hours of training to completedeleted text end . (c) The number of in-service training hours may be prorated for deleted text begin individualsdeleted text end new text begin center directors and staff personsnew text end not employed for an entire year. (d) Each year, in-service training must include: (1) the center's procedures for maintaining health and safety according to section 142B.66 and Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0140, and handling emergencies and accidents according to Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0110; (2) the reporting responsibilities under chapter 260E and Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0130; (3) at least one-half hour of training on the standards under section 142B.46 and on reducing the risk of sudden unexpected infant death as required under subdivision 6, if applicable; and (4) at least one-half hour of training on the risk of abusive head trauma from shaking infants and young children as required under subdivision 7, if applicable. (e) Each year, or when a change is made, whichever is more frequent, in-service training must be provided on: (1) the center's risk reduction plan under section 142B.54, subdivision 2; and (2) a child's individual child care program plan as required under Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0065, subpart 3. (f) At least once every two calendar years, the in-service training must include: (1) child development and learning training under subdivision 3; (2) pediatric first aid that meets the requirements of subdivision 4; (3) pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation training that meets the requirements of subdivision 5; (4) cultural dynamics training to increase awareness of cultural differences; and (5) disabilities training to increase awareness of differing abilities of children. (g) At least once every five years, in-service training must include child passenger restraint training that meets the requirements of subdivision 8, if applicable. (h) The remaining hours of the in-service training requirement must be met by completing training in the following content areas of the Minnesota Knowledge and Competency Framework: (1) Content area I: child development and learning; (2) Content area II: developmentally appropriate learning experiences; (3) Content area III: relationships with families; (4) Content area IV: assessment, evaluation, and individualization; (5) Content area V: historical and contemporary development of early childhood education; (6) Content area VI: professionalism; (7) Content area VII: health, safety, and nutrition; and (8) Content area VIII: application through clinical experiences. (i) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given them. (1) "Child development and learning training" means training in understanding how children develop physically, cognitively, emotionally, and socially and learn as part of the children's family, culture, and community. (2) "Developmentally appropriate learning experiences" means creating positive learning experiences, promoting cognitive development, promoting social and emotional development, promoting physical development, and promoting creative development. (3) "Relationships with families" means training on building a positive, respectful relationship with the child's family. (4) "Assessment, evaluation, and individualization" means training in observing, recording, and assessing development; assessing and using information to plan; and assessing and using information to enhance and maintain program quality. (5) "Historical and contemporary development of early childhood education" means training in past and current practices in early childhood education and how current events and issues affect children, families, and programs. (6) "Professionalism" means training in knowledge, skills, and abilities that promote ongoing professional development. (7) "Health, safety, and nutrition" means training in establishing health practices, ensuring safety, and providing healthy nutrition. (8) "Application through clinical experiences" means clinical experiences in which a person applies effective teaching practices using a range of educational programming models. (j) The license holder must ensure that documentation, as required in subdivision 10, includes the number of total training hours required to be completed, name of the training, the Minnesota Knowledge and Competency Framework content area, number of hours completed, and the director's approval of the training. (k) In-service training completed by a staff person that is not specific to that child care center is transferable upon a staff person's change in employment to another child care program. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.66, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Emergency preparedness. (a) A licensed child care center must have a written emergency plan for emergencies that require evacuation, sheltering, or other protection of a child, such as fire, natural disaster, intruder, or other threatening situation that may pose a health or safety hazard to a child. The plan must be written on a form developed by the commissioner and must include: (1) procedures for an evacuation, relocation, shelter-in-place, or lockdown; (2) a designated relocation site and evacuation route; (3) procedures for notifying a child's parent or legal guardian of the evacuation, relocation, shelter-in-place, or lockdown, including procedures for reunification with families; (4) accommodations for a child with a disability or a chronic medical condition; (5) procedures for storing a child's medically necessary medicine that facilitates easy removal during an evacuation or relocation; (6) procedures for continuing operations in the period during and after a crisis; (7) procedures for communicating with local emergency management officials, law enforcement officials, or other appropriate state or local authorities; and (8) accommodations for infants and toddlers. (b) The license holder must train staff persons on the emergency plan at orientation, when changes are made to the plan, and at least once each calendar year. Training must be documented in each staff person's personnel file. (c) The license holder must conduct drills according to the requirements in Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0110, subpart 3. The date and time of the drills must be documented. (d) The license holder must review and update the emergency plan deleted text begin annuallydeleted text end new text begin each calendar yearnew text end . Documentation of the deleted text begin annualdeleted text end new text begin yearlynew text end emergency plan review shall be maintained in the program's administrative records. (e) The license holder must include the emergency plan in the program's policies and procedures as specified under section 142B.10, subdivision 21. The license holder must provide a physical or electronic copy of the emergency plan to the child's parent or legal guardian upon enrollment. (f) The relocation site and evacuation route must be posted in a visible place as part of the written procedures for emergencies and accidents in Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0140, subpart 21. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.70, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Child passenger restraint systems; training requirement. (a) A license holder must comply with all seat belt and child passenger restraint system requirements under section 169.685. (b) Family and group family child care programs licensed by the Department of Children, Youth, and Families that serve a child or children under deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end years of age must document training that fulfills the requirements in this subdivision. (1) Before a license holder, second adult caregiver, substitute, or helper transports a child or children under age deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end in a motor vehicle, the person placing the child or children in a passenger restraint must satisfactorily complete training on the proper use and installation of child restraint systems in motor vehicles. Training completed under this subdivision may be used to meet initial training under subdivision 1 or ongoing training under subdivision 8. (2) Training required under this subdivision must be at least one hour in length, completed at initial training, and repeated at least once every five years. At a minimum, the training must address the proper use of child restraint systems based on the child's size, weight, and age, and the proper installation of a car seat or booster seat in the motor vehicle used by the license holder to transport the child or children. (3) Training under this subdivision must be provided by individuals who are certified and approved by the Department of Public Safety, Office of Traffic Safety. License holders may obtain a list of certified and approved trainers through the Department of Public Safety website or by contacting the agency. (c) Child care providers that only transport school-age children as defined in section 142B.01, subdivision 13, paragraph (f), in child care buses as defined in section 169.448, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), are exempt from this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.70, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Training requirements for family and group family child care. (a) For purposes of family and group family child care, the license holder and each second adult caregiver must complete 16 hours of ongoing training each year. Repeat of topical training requirements in subdivisions 3 to 9 shall count toward the annual 16-hour training requirement. Additional ongoing training subjects to meet the annual 16-hour training requirement must be selected from the following areas: (1) child development and learning training in understanding how a child develops physically, cognitively, emotionally, and socially, and how a child learns as part of the child's family, culture, and community; (2) developmentally appropriate learning experiences, including training in creating positive learning experiences, promoting cognitive development, promoting social and emotional development, promoting physical development, promoting creative development; and behavior guidance; (3) relationships with families, including training in building a positive, respectful relationship with the child's family; (4) assessment, evaluation, and individualization, including training in observing, recording, and assessing development; assessing and using information to plan; and assessing and using information to enhance and maintain program quality; (5) historical and contemporary development of early childhood education, including training in past and current practices in early childhood education and how current events and issues affect children, families, and programs; (6) professionalism, including training in knowledge, skills, and abilities that promote ongoing professional development; and (7) health, safety, and nutrition, including training in establishing healthy practices; ensuring safety; and providing healthy nutrition. (b) A provider who is approved as a trainer through the Develop data system may count up to two hours of training instruction toward the annual 16-hour training requirement in paragraph (a). The provider may only count training instruction hours for the first instance in which they deliver a particular content-specific training during each licensing year. Hours counted as training instruction must be approved through the Develop data system with attendance verified on the trainer's individual learning record and must be in Knowledge and Competency Framework content area VII A (Establishing Healthy Practices) or B (Ensuring Safety). new text begin (c) Substitutes and adult caregivers who provide care for 500 or fewer hours per year must complete a minimum of one hour of training each calendar year, and the training must include the requirements in subdivisions 3, 4, 5, 6, and 9. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142C.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Requirement to post conditional certification. new text end new text begin Upon receipt of any order of conditional certification issued by the commissioner under this section, and notwithstanding a pending request for reconsideration of the order of conditional certification by the certification holder, the certification holder shall post the order of conditional certification in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility for the duration of the conditional certification. When the order of conditional certification is accompanied by a maltreatment investigation memorandum prepared under chapter 260E, the investigation memoranda must be posted with the order of conditional certification. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142C.11, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Required policies. A certified center must have written policies for health and safety items in subdivisions 1 to 6new text begin , 9, and 10new text end . Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142C.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. First aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation. (a) Before having unsupervised direct contact with a child, but within 90 days after the first date of direct contact with a child, the director, all staff persons, substitutes, and unsupervised volunteers must successfully complete pediatric first aid and pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training, unless the training has been completed within the previous two calendar years. Staff must complete the pediatric first aid and pediatric CPR training at least every other calendar year and the center must document the training in the staff person's personnel record. (b) Training completed under this subdivision may be used to meet the in-service training requirements under subdivision 6. new text begin (c) Training must include CPR and techniques for providing immediate care to people experiencing life-threatening cardiac emergencies, choking, bleeding, fractures and sprains, head injuries, poisoning, and burns. Training developed by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross, or another organization that uses nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines meets these requirements. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142C.12, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. In-service training. (a) The certified center must ensure that the director and all staff persons, including substitutes and unsupervised volunteers, are trained at least once each calendar year on health and safety requirements in this section and sections 142C.10, 142C.11, and 142C.13. (b) The director and each staff person, not including substitutes, must complete at least six hours of training each calendar year. new text begin Substitutes must complete at least two hours of training each calendar year. new text end Training required under paragraph (a) may be used toward the hourly training requirements of this subdivision. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.18, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Seat belt and child passenger restraint system use. All license holders that transport children must comply with the requirements of section 142B.51, subdivision 1, and license holders that transport a child or children under deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin ninenew text end years of age must document training that fulfills the requirements in section 142B.51, subdivision 2. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 21. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES; AMENDING THE DEFINITION OF EDUCATION.new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families must amend Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0030, subpart 1, item B, to include any accredited coursework from an accredited postsecondary institution that can reasonably be shown to be relevant to any skill necessary to meet the qualifications of a teacher. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 22. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES; STANDARDIZED LICENSING VISIT TIMELINE AND REQUIREMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families must, in consultation with stakeholders, develop and implement a standardized timeline and standards for the conduct of licensors when conducting inspections of licensed child care centers. The timeline and standards developed by the commissioner must clearly identify: new text end new text begin (1) the steps of a licensing visit; new text end new text begin (2) the expectations for licensors and license holders before, during, and after the licensing visit; new text end new text begin (3) the standards of conduct that licensors must follow during a visit; new text end new text begin (4) the rights of license holders; new text end new text begin (5) when and how license holders can request technical assistance; and new text end new text begin (6) a process for license holders to request additional review of an issue related to the licensing visit from someone other than the assigned licensor. new text end new text begin (b) The timeline and standards must be implemented by January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 23. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES; STANDARDIZED COUNTY-DELEGATED LICENSING.new text end new text begin By January 1, 2026, the commissioner of children, youth, and families must: new text end new text begin (1) establish time frames for county licensors to respond to time-sensitive or urgent requests and implement a system to track response times to the requests; and new text end new text begin (2) require county licensors to use the electronic licensing inspection tool during an inspection of a family child care provider and to complete the inspection report on site with the license holder, including direct communication related to any correction orders issued. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES; AMENDING CAPACITY LIMITS.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families must amend Minnesota Rules, part 9502.0365, subpart 1, item A, to exclude one of the caregiver's own children for the purposes of the licensed capacity, provided the excluded child is at least eight years old and the caregiver has never been determined to have maltreated a child or vulnerable adult under Minnesota Statutes, section 626.557 or chapter 260E. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section and notwithstanding any other requirements for good cause exempt rulemaking, the commissioner may use the process under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end ARTICLE 7 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TOTAL APPROPRIATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,312,562,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,341,630,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 1,084,402,000 new text end new text begin 1,093,008,000 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 732,000 new text end new text begin 732,000 new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin 227,428,000 new text end new text begin 247,890,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following sections. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin TANF MAINTENANCE OF EFFORTnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Nonfederal Expenditures new text end new text begin The commissioner shall ensure that sufficient qualified nonfederal expenditures are made each year to meet the state's maintenance of effort requirements of the TANF block grant specified under Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 263.1. In order to meet these basic TANF maintenance of effort requirements, the commissioner may report as TANF maintenance of effort expenditures only nonfederal money expended for allowable activities listed in the following clauses: new text end new text begin (1) MFIP cash, diversionary work program, and food assistance benefits under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 142G; new text end new text begin (2) the child care assistance programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 142E.04 and 142E.08, and county child care administrative costs under Minnesota Statutes, section 142E.02, subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (3) state and county MFIP administrative costs under Minnesota Statutes, chapters 142G and 256K; new text end new text begin (4) state, county, and Tribal MFIP employment services under Minnesota Statutes, chapters 142G and 256K; new text end new text begin (5) expenditures made on behalf of legal noncitizen MFIP recipients who qualify for the MinnesotaCare program under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256L; new text end new text begin (6) qualifying working family credit expenditures under Minnesota Statutes, section 290.0671, and child tax credit expenditures under Minnesota Statutes, section 290.0661; new text end new text begin (7) qualifying Minnesota education credit expenditures under Minnesota Statutes, section 290.0674; and new text end new text begin (8) qualifying Head Start expenditures under Minnesota Statutes, section 142D.12. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Nonfederal Expenditures; Reporting new text end new text begin For the activities listed in subdivision 1, clauses (2) to (8), the commissioner may report only expenditures that are excluded from the definition of assistance under Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 260.31. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Supplemental Expenditures new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, the commissioner may supplement the maintenance of effort claim with working family credit expenditures or other qualified expenditures to the extent such expenditures are otherwise available after considering the expenditures allowed in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reduction of Appropriations; Exception new text end new text begin The requirement in Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.06, subdivision 3, that federal grants or aids secured or obtained under that subdivision be used to reduce any direct appropriations provided by law does not apply if the grants or aids are federal TANF funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin IT Appropriations Generally new text end new text begin This appropriation includes funds for information technology projects, services, and support. Funding for information technology project costs must be incorporated into the service level agreement and paid to Minnesota IT Services by the Department of Children, Youth, and Families under the rates and mechanism specified in that agreement. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Receipts for Systems Project new text end new text begin Appropriations and federal receipts for information technology systems projects for MAXIS, PRISM, MMIS, ISDS, METS, and SSIS must be deposited in the state systems account authorized in Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.04. Money appropriated for information technology projects approved by the commissioner of Minnesota IT Services funded by the legislature, and approved by the commissioner of management and budget may be transferred from one project to another and from development to operations as the commissioner of children, youth, and families considers necessary. Any unexpended balance in the appropriation for these projects does not cancel and is available for ongoing development and operations. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Federal SNAP Education and Training Grants new text end new text begin Federal funds available during fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Education and Training and SNAP Quality Control Performance Bonus grants are appropriated to the commissioner of human services for the purposes allowable under the terms of the federal award. This subdivision is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; AGENCY SUPPORTSnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 138,348,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 101,945,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 137,516,000 new text end new text begin 101,113,000 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 732,000 new text end new text begin 732,000 new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Information Technology new text end new text begin $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for information technology improvements to SSIS. The appropriation must be used to develop and implement a modernization plan for SSIS that addresses priorities established through collaborative planning with counties and Tribal Nations that use SSIS. Priorities must take into consideration available funding and have a direct impact on child welfare casework. The appropriation must not be used for changes to SSIS that are not part of the child welfare modernization plan. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment new text end new text begin The general fund base is $95,066,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $95,066,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; CHILD SAFETY AND PERMANENCYnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 17,232,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 16,945,000 new text end Sec. 6. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; EARLY CHILDHOODnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 17,212,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,337,000 new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Child Care Attendance and Record-Keeping System new text end new text begin $5,555,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,639,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to develop a statewide electronic attendance and record-keeping system for the child care assistance program. The system must provide the commissioner, county agencies, and Tribal Nations that administer the program with real-time access to electronic attendance records to verify children's enrollment in the program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment new text end new text begin The general fund base is $11,698,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $11,698,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITIES AND YOUTH SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,852,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,562,000 new text end Sec. 8. new text begin CENTRAL OFFICE; FAMILY WELL-BEINGnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,147,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,147,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 10,471,000 new text end new text begin 10,471,000 new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin 3,676,000 new text end new text begin 3,676,000 new text end Sec. 9. new text begin FORECASTED PROGRAMS; MFIP/DWPnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 230,473,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 268,167,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 103,272,000 new text end new text begin 120,504,000 new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin 127,201,000 new text end new text begin 147,663,000 new text end Sec. 10. new text begin FORECASTED PROGRAMS; MFIP CHILD CARE ASSISTANCEnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 100,244,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 137,333,000 new text end Sec. 11. new text begin FORECASTED PROGRAMS; NORTHSTAR CARE FOR CHILDRENnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 110,214,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 116,160,000 new text end Sec. 12. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; SUPPORT SERVICES GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 111,359,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 111,359,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 14,908,000 new text end new text begin 14,908,000 new text end new text begin Federal TANF new text end new text begin 96,451,000 new text end new text begin 96,451,000 new text end Sec. 13. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; BASIC SLIDING FEE CHILD ASSISTANCE CARE GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 137,768,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 135,212,000 new text end Sec. 14. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; CHILD CARE DEVELOPMENT GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 139,319,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 138,819,000 new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is from the general fund for child care provider access to technology grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 142D.23, subdivision 3, clause (5). This appropriation is available until fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 50,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 50,000 new text end Sec. 16. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; CHILDREN'S SERVICES GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 43,204,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 43,205,000 new text end new text begin The commissioner shall allocate funds from the state's savings from the Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act's expanded eligibility for Title IV-E adoption assistance as required in Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.61, and as allowable under federal law. Additional savings to the state as a result of the Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act's expanded eligibility for Title IV-E adoption assistance is for postadoption, foster care, adoption, and kinship services, including a parent-to-parent support network and as allowable under federal law. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; CHILDREN AND COMMUNITY SERVICE GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 87,984,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 87,984,000 new text end Sec. 18. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; CHILDREN AND ECONOMIC SUPPORT GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,327,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 12,426,000 new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin FAIM new text end new text begin $209,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $210,000 in fiscal year 2027 are from the general fund for the family assets for independence program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin American Indian Food Sovereignty Funding Program new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for the American Indian food sovereignty funding program under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.15. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minnesota Food Shelf Program new text end new text begin $451,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for the Minnesota food shelf program under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.14. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Prepared Meals Food Relief new text end new text begin $451,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for prepared meals food relief grants under Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 12, section 33. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Minnesota Food Bank Program new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is for Minnesota's regional food banks with an annual operating budget of less than $100,000,000 that the commissioner contracts with for the purposes of the emergency food assistance program (TEFAP). The commissioner shall distribute funding under this paragraph in accordance with the federal TEFAP formula and guidelines of the United States Department of Agriculture. Funding must be used to purchase food that will be distributed free of charge to TEFAP partner agencies. Funding must also cover the handling and delivery fees typically paid by food shelves to food banks to ensure that costs associated with funding under this paragraph are not incurred at the local level. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment new text end new text begin The general fund base is $12,216,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $12,216,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 19. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; EARLY LEARNING GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 138,688,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 132,838,000 new text end Sec. 20. new text begin GRANT PROGRAMS; YOUTH SERVICES GRANTSnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 8,141,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 8,141,000 new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Restorative Practices Initiative Grant new text end new text begin $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are from the general fund for restorative practices initiative grants. The general fund base for this appropriation is $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Base Level Adjustment new text end new text begin The general fund base is $8,891,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $8,891,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 21. new text begin TECHNICAL ACTIVITIESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 74,493,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 74,493,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the federal TANF fund. new text end Sec. 22. Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 8, is amended to read: Sec. 8. OFFICE OF THE FOSTER YOUTH OMBUDSPERSON $ 842,000 $ 759,000 new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end Sec. 23. new text begin CANCELLATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Child welfare initiative grants. new text end new text begin $5,294,000 of the fiscal year 2025 general fund appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 2, subdivision 22, paragraph (b), is canceled to the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishing the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin $8,500,000 of the fiscal year 2024 general fund appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 12, paragraph (b), is canceled to the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Social service information system technology improvements. new text end new text begin $5,059,000 of the fiscal year 2024 general fund appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, section 2, subdivision 4, paragraph (g), is canceled to the general fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment, or retroactively from June 30, 2025, whichever is earlier. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin TRANSFERS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Programs and grants. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families, with the approval of the commissioner of management and budget, may transfer unencumbered appropriation balances for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, within fiscal years among MFIP; MFIP child care assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 142E.08; the entitlement portion of Northstar Care for Children under Minnesota Statutes, sections 142A.60 to 142A.612; and early childhood family education under Minnesota Statutes, section 142D.11, between fiscal years of the biennium. The commissioner shall inform the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children and families finance and policy quarterly about transfers made under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin Positions, salary money, and nonsalary administrative money may be transferred within the Department of Children, Youth, and Families as the commissioners deem necessary, with the advance approval of the commissioner of management and budget. The commissioners shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children and families finance quarterly about transfers made under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Interdepartmental transfers. new text end new text begin Administrative money may be transferred between the Department of Children, Youth, and Families and Department of Human Services or the Department of Education as the commissioners deem necessary, with the advance approval of the commissioner of management and budget. The commissioners shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children and families finance and policy quarterly about transfers made under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 25. new text begin EXPIRATION OF UNCODIFIED LANGUAGE.new text end new text begin All uncodified language contained in this article expires on June 30, 2027, unless a different expiration date is explicit or an appropriation is made available beyond June 30, 2027. new text end Sec. 26. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS GIVEN EFFECT ONCE.new text end new text begin If an appropriation, transfer, or cancellation in this article is enacted more than once during the 2025 regular session, the appropriation, transfer, or cancellation must be given effect once. new text end ARTICLE 8 OTHER CHILDREN AND FAMILIES AGENCY APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin OTHER AGENCY APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin OMBUDSPERSON FOR FAMILIESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 792,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 808,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin OMBUDSPERSON FOR AMERICAN INDIAN FAMILIESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 344,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 347,000 new text end Sec. 4. new text begin OFFICE OF THE FOSTER YOUTH OMBUDSPERSONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 772,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 785,000 new text end Sec. 5. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 7,950,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 7,950,000 new text end Sec. 6. new text begin EXPIRATION OF UNCODIFIED LANGUAGE.new text end new text begin All uncodified language contained in this article expires on June 30, 2027, unless a different expiration date is explicit or an appropriation is made available beyond June 30, 2027. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS GIVEN EFFECT ONCE.new text end new text begin If an appropriation, transfer, or cancellation in this article is enacted more than once during the 2025 regular session, the appropriation, transfer, or cancellation must be given effect once. new text end